Louisiana, session 2026, HB1141.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 2 of this Act amends and reenacts Chapter 1-C of Code Title IV
of Code Book III of Title 9 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S.
9:2718 through 2720.15 in its entirety. Due to the length of this Chapter, present law is not
included as overstruck text.
Section 2. Chapter 1-C of Code Title IV of Code Book III of Title 9 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 9:2718 through 2720.15, is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 9:2720.16 through 2720.23 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 1-C. LOUISIANA FAMILY BUILDING AND MATERNAL HEALTH
PROTECTION ACT
PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS
§2718. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Family
Building and Maternal Health Protection Act", "Family Building and Maternal
Health Act", or "FBMHA".
§2719. Legislative findings and purpose
A. The Legislature of Louisiana finds that advances in assisted reproductive
technology have made gestational carrier arrangements a medically viable path to
parenthood for individuals and couples who are unable to conceive or carry a
pregnancy to term and the existing statutory framework in this state does not
adequately address the legal complexities arising from gestational carrier
arrangements which leaves intended parents, gestational carriers, and children
without clear and predictable legal protections.
B. It is the policy of this state to respect the reproductive autonomy of
individuals and to enforce voluntarily and knowingly executed gestational carrier
agreements that comply with the requirements of this Chapter and establishing
parentage through a clear statutory framework promotes the best interests of children
born through gestational carrier arrangements by ensuring certainty of legal
parentage from the moment of birth.
Page 2 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
C. This state has a compelling interest in protecting all parties to a
gestational carrier arrangement, particularly the gestational carrier, by requiring
independent legal counsel, medical evaluation, and psychological consultation before
any agreement is enforceable.
D. This Chapter operates within the framework of Louisiana's Human
Embryo Statutes which define an in vitro fertilized human ovum as a juridical person
with specified rights and protections. As the Fourth Circuit recognized in Loeb v.
Vergara, 313 So. 3d 346 (La. App. 4th Cir. 2021), an in vitro fertilized ovum is not
classified as a "child" for purposes of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and
Enforcement Act . Therefore, the legislature finds that the recognition of gestational
carrier agreements and compensated arrangements pursuant to this Chapter is framed
as consistent with and not in derogation of this state's policy of protecting embryos.
E. Nothing in this Chapter is intended to commodify embryos, gametes, or
children. Compensation and agency involvement are regulated to protect all
participants, promote transparency, and deter exploitation, while honoring the
juridical protections the legislature has separately accorded to in vitro fertilized
human ovum.
F. State law provides that the state registrar shall collect data on enforceable
gestational carrier contracts, including characteristics of the carrier and intended
parents, treating physicians, medical procedures performed, and outcomes. That
existing data collection infrastructure is a valuable foundation for the expanded
reporting requirements of this Chapter and Chapter 2-B of Title 40 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, R.S. 40:101 through 127. The legislature intends that the
reporting obligations in those Chapters shall build upon and modernize the
framework of R.S. 40:94 to cover compensated arrangements, agency involvement,
and outcomes data sufficient to support ongoing legislative oversight and evidence
based policy development.
G. The Legislature of Louisiana also finds that regulation of compensated
gestational carrier arrangements through a transparent, safeguarded market
Page 3 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
framework is the most effective means of achieving the state's interests in protecting
gestational carriers from exploitation, ensuring informed consent and independent
counsel, maintaining accurate vital records and health data, and securing the
parentage rights of children. The legislature finds that permitting compensation and
recognizing agency involvement, subject to the conditions of this Chapter and
Chapter 2-B of Title 40, R.S. 40:101 through 127, advances those interests and is not
inconsistent with Louisiana's embryo-protective public policy.
H. Jurisprudence of this state recognizes broad legislative authority to vest
regulatory, licensing, standards-setting, and quasi-judicial functions in executive
agencies provided that district courts retain original jurisdiction over civil matters
historically adjudicated by the judiciary. The Louisiana Supreme Court held in
Wooley v. State Farm Fire & Casualty Insurance Co., 893 So. 2d 746 (La. 2005),
that approval of insurance policy forms by the Commissioner of Insurance is a
regulatory determination in the executive branch and not a "civil matter" within
Article V, Section 16(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana and that administrative
law judges exercising quasi-judicial authority in that context do not
unconstitutionally exercise judicial power. That same principle extends to permitting
decisions under environmental statutes. The legislature accordingly finds that the
assignment of licensing, screening compliance, escrow oversight, disclosure review,
and enforcement authority to the Louisiana Department of Health pursuant to
Chapter 2-B of Title 40, R.S. 40:101 through 127, is a regulatory and executive
function historically associated with professional licensing and consumer protection
agencies not a civil matter historically adjudicated by district courts and is
constitutionally permissible under Article V, Section 16(A) of the Constitution of
Louisiana and the separation-of-powers doctrine.
I. The Louisiana Department of Health, through its Health Standards Section
and its statutory authority pursuant to R.S. 40:2140 et seq. already exercises the type
of licensing, standards-setting, inspection, and record-keeping authority
contemplated for gestational carrier agency regulation. The Louisiana Department
Page 4 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
of Health licenses health facilities and agencies, certifies providers for Medicare and
Medicaid participation, conducts surveys and inspections, and conditions license
renewal on compliance with data reporting requirements. The legislature therefore
finds that vesting gestational carrier agency regulation in the Louisiana Department
of Health through Chapter 2-B of Title 40, R.S. 40:101 through 127, is consistent
with the Louisiana Department of Health's existing mission, expertise, and statutory
authority, and requires no new institutional infrastructure beyond the creation of a
licensing category and associated rulemaking in accordance with R.S. 49:950 et seq.
J. The purpose of this Chapter is to:
(1) Provide a comprehensive statutory framework for gestational carrier
agreements, framed as consistent with Louisiana's Human Embryo Statutes and the
juridical protections those statutes accord to in vitro fertilized human ovum as
construed in Loeb v. Vergara, 313 So. 3d 346 (La. App. 4th Cir. 2021).
(2) Establish clear eligibility criteria, procedural safeguards, and judicial
processes for the determination of parentage while preserving the district court's
original jurisdiction over parentage as a civil matter under Article V, Section 16(A)
of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(3) Align state law with contemporary medical practice and the legal
standards recognized in other jurisdictions of the United States.
(4) Expand and modernize the data reporting infrastructure of R.S. 40:94 to
cover compensated arrangements and agency involvement, in furtherance of
legislative oversight and evidence based policy
(5) Recognize and regulate gestational carrier agencies as a licensed category
of health related intermediaries pursuant to the authority of the Louisiana
Department of Health, consistent with Wooley v. State Farm, 893 So. 2d 746 (La.
2005), and the legislature's broad authority to delegate regulatory and quasi-judicial
functions to executive agencies in accordance with R.S. 49:950 et seq.
(6) Create a regulated, transparent market for gestational carrier
arrangements in which compensation and agency involvement are lawful, subject to
Page 5 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
the substantive and procedural conditions of this Chapter and Chapter 2-B of Title
40, R.S. 40:101 through 127, to protect all participants, especially gestational
carriers, while honoring Louisiana's public policy to protect embryos.
§2720. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
(1) "Assisted reproduction" means a method of causing pregnancy other than
sexual intercourse including but not limited to intrauterine insemination, donation
of eggs or embryos, in vitro fertilization, embryo transfer, and intracytoplasmic
sperm injection.
(2) "Compensation" means payment of any valuable consideration in excess
of reimbursement of reasonable expenses directly incurred in connection with a
gestational carrier agreement.
(3) "Donor" means an individual who contributes gametes for use in assisted
reproduction and who does not intend to be a parent of any resulting child.
(4) "Embryo" means a fertilized egg at any stage of development prior to
birth.
(5) "Gamete" means a sperm or an egg.
(6) "Gestational carrier" means a woman, who is not an intended parent, who
agrees to become pregnant through assisted reproduction using an embryo not
genetically related to her, and who relinquishes any claim to parentage of the
resulting child in favor of the intended parent or intended parents.
(7) "Gestational carrier agreement" or "agreement" means a written contract
satisfying the requirements of this Chapter between a gestational carrier, her spouse
if any, and the intended parent. In an arrangement facilitated by an agency, the
operative instrument is an agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement as
defined in this Section. The agency is not a signatory party to the gestational carrier
agreement or agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement and may not be
designated a required party. The agency's role is limited to the administrative
functions specified in this Section.
Page 6 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(8) "Gestational carrier's spouse" means the individual, if any, who is legally
married to the gestational carrier at the time the agreement is executed.
(9) "Intended parent" means an individual, married or unmarried who
manifests intent to be legally bound as a parent of a child conceived through a
gestational carrier arrangement pursuant to a compliant agreement pursuant to this
Chapter.
(10) "Licensed healthcare provider" means a physician, surgeon, or advanced
practice registered nurse licensed under the laws of this state or any other state who
provides medical services related to assisted reproduction.
(11) "Licensed mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed professional counselor, or
licensed marriage and family therapist licensed under the laws of this state or any
other state.
(12) "Parentage order" means a court order establishing the legal relationship
between a child and the intended parent.
(13) "Reasonable expenses" means verifiable, out-of-pocket expenses
directly attributable to the gestational carrier arrangement including medical, legal,
psychological, travel, lodging, lost wages due to pregnancy-related medical
necessity, childcare during medical appointments, and maternity clothing costs.
(14) "Gestational carrier agency" means any partnership, limited liability
company, corporation, nonprofit organization, professional association, or other legal
entity that recruits, solicits, matches, coordinates, or facilitates gestational carrier
arrangements between gestational carriers and intended parents or that collects,
holds, manages, or disburses funds in connection with such arrangements. The term
has the same meaning as in R.S. 40:103. A natural person acting as an individual
and not through or on behalf of a partnership, limited liability company, corporation,
or other legal entity is not a gestational carrier agency. An attorney acting
exclusively as legal counsel, a licensed healthcare provider acting exclusively in a
clinical capacity, and a licensed mental health professional acting exclusively in a
Page 7 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
therapeutic or evaluative capacity are not gestational carrier agencies by reason of
those activities.
(15) "Parents-agency enrollment agreement" means a written contract
between a licensed gestational carrier agency and the intended parent or intended
parents executed before or concurrently with matching that includes all of the
following information:
(a) The scope of the agency's enrollment, screening, and matching services.
(b) The agency's complete fee schedule, refund policy, and payment
milestones.
(c) The escrow arrangements required by R.S. 40:106 including the
preexecution counseling fund required by R.S. 9:2720.2(D)(1).
(d) All mandated safeguards applicable to intended parents including the
disclosure requirements of R.S. 40:2199.10, insurance obligations pursuant to R.S.
40:114, counseling requirements pursuant to R.S. 9:2720.2(C), and independent
counsel obligations pursuant to R.S. 40:112.
(e)(i) The agency's obligations pursuant to Chapter 2-B of Title 40, R.S.
40:101 through 127.
(ii) The parents-agency enrollment agreement is governed by this Chapter
and R.S. 40:101 et seq.
(f) The gestational carrier is not a party to the parents-agency enrollment
agreement and no obligation of the gestational carrier may be created in that
instrument.
(16) "Carrier-agency engagement agreement" means a written contract
between a licensed gestational carrier agency and a gestational carrier executed
before or concurrently with matching that includes all of the following information:
(a) The gestational carrier's eligibility criteria and the agency's screening
obligations pursuant to R.S. 9:2720.5 and R.S. 40:111 including verification of the
medical clearance required by R.S. 9:2720.1.
Page 8 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(b) A pre-set compensation and expense grid that specifies the base
compensation range and all expense and reimbursement categories to be negotiated
in accordance with R.S. 9:2720.13. The grid shall be incorporated by reference into
any agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement executed with matched
intended parents.
(c) Behavioral expectations during the arrangement including prenatal care
compliance and substance-avoidance obligations consistent with R.S. 9:2720.8.
(d) Expectations consistent with the gestational carrier's absolute medical
decision-making authority pursuant to R.S. 9:2720.8 and the termination prohibition
of R.S. 9:2720.9.
(e) The gestational carrier's agreement to enter an agency-coordinated
gestational carrier agreement with any intended parents matched by the agency, on
terms consistent with the pre-set grid and all statutory requirements of this Chapter,
subject to review by the gestational carrier's independent legal counsel before
execution.
(f) The agency's counseling cost payment obligations pursuant to R.S.
9:2720.2.
(g) The gestational carrier's right to withdraw from the matching process at
any time before execution of an agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement
without penalty. The carrier-agency engagement agreement is governed by this
Chapter and R.S. 40:101 et seq.
(h) No provision of the carrier-agency engagement agreement may waive,
reduce, or condition any statutory right of the gestational carrier pursuant to this
Chapter, and any such provision is void as against public policy.
(i) In the event of a conflict between the carrier-agency engagement
agreement and an agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement, the
agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement controls as to all rights and
obligations of the gestational carrier with respect to the intended parents.
Page 9 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(17) "Agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement" means the
gestational carrier agreement produced, coordinated, and submitted by a licensed
gestational carrier agency in connection with an agency-facilitated arrangement,
which meets all of the following:
(a) Is in the statutory form required by R.S. 9:2723 and satisfies all
requirements of this Chapter.
(b) Incorporates the compensation and expense grid established in the
carrier-agency engagement agreement.
(c) Is signed by the intended parent or intended parents, the gestational
carrier, and the gestational carrier's spouse, if applicable, as the principal parties.
(d) Names the licensed gestational carrier agency only for the limited
purposes of fee routing and disbursement pursuant to R.S. 40:106 data reporting to
the Louisiana Department of Health, in accordance with R.S. 40:127 and birth
notification pursuant to R.S. 9:2720.22.
(e) Is subject to independent review by the gestational carrier's own legal
counsel before the carrier executes the agreement consistent with R.S. 9:2720.1.
(f) Controls over both the parents-agency enrollment agreement and the
carrier-agency engagement agreement as to all rights and obligations of the
gestational carrier with respect to the intended parents.
(g) The agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement is the operative
legal instrument establishing parentage rights and obligations and is not merely a
form produced for administrative convenience. The agency is not a signatory party
to the agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement and does not acquire
parental, custodial, or guardian rights by reason of coordinating or producing the
agreement.
(18) "Medically necessary" means that at least one intended parent has been
diagnosed as infertile or has a physical condition such that pregnancy would create
a serious risk of death or substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily
function beyond the customary risks of pregnancy and childbirth as determined
Page 10 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
jointly by two licensed physicians one being a board certified obstetrician
gynecologist and one being a board certified reproductive endocrinologist or a
physician specializing in fertility medicine. The two physicians shall each
independently examine the qualifying intended parent and provide a signed written
opinion confirming the diagnosis. One physician shall not satisfy both physician
requirements.
PART II. ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS
§2720.1. Gestational carrier eligibility
A. A gestational carrier shall, at the time of execution of the agreement meet
the following requirements:
(1) Be at least twenty-four years old and not more than forty years old at the
time of execution of the agreement.
(2) Have previously given birth to at least one live child.
(3) Have been evaluated and cleared for pregnancy by a licensed healthcare
provider experienced in reproductive medicine which clearance shall be based upon
a review of the gestational carrier's complete medical history including:
(a) Prior pregnancy and obstetric history, including any complications,
losses, or cesarean deliveries.
(b) Current and prior physical health conditions including chronic illnesses,
surgeries, and medications.
(c) Mental health history including any prior diagnoses, treatments,
hospitalizations, or conditions that could affect the gestational carrier's capacity to
provide informed consent or her ability to carry a pregnancy to term.
(d) Substance use history including current or prior use of alcohol, tobacco,
controlled substances, or prescription medications not otherwise disclosed.
(e) Known genetic conditions or hereditary diseases that may be relevant to
the health of the carrier or the pregnancy.
(f) Any other condition the licensed healthcare provider determines to be
clinically relevant. The licensed healthcare provider shall provide a signed written
Page 11 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
clearance letter confirming that a complete medical history in all applicable
categories was reviewed and that the gestational carrier is medically suitable to carry
a pregnancy. The clearance letter, which shall not include the gestational carrier's
full medical records, shall be affixed to the agreement and retained in the
arrangement file pursuant to R.S. 40:115.
(4) Have agreed to complete the mandatory counseling sessions required by
R.S. 9:2720.2 after execution of the agreement and prior to any embryo transfer
procedure, as evidenced by the agreement's inclusion of the counseling obligation
required by R.S. 9:2723(B).
(5) Have received independent legal advice from an attorney of the
gestational carrier's own choosing, not selected or compensated by the intended
parent or intended parents, regarding the terms and legal consequences of the
agreement.
(6) Not be receiving medicaid, supplemental security income, or similar
public assistance as a primary source of healthcare coverage unless the agreement
provides for independent healthcare coverage throughout the pregnancy and for not
less than twelve months postpartum.
(7) Not be disqualified on the basis of any familial or genetic relationship to
any intended parent subject to the provisions of Subsection C of this Section.
B. The gestational carrier's spouse, if any, shall also meet all of the
following:
(1) Complete the mandatory counseling sessions required by R.S.
9:2720.2(B) after execution of the agreement and prior to any embryo transfer
procedure.
(2) Receive legal advice regarding the agreement from a licensed attorney
who may be the same attorney representing the gestational carrier.
(3) Execute the gestational carrier agreement.
C. A gestational carrier is not disqualified solely because she is related by
blood, marriage, or adoption to one or both intended parents. Family members
Page 12 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
including but not limited to a sister, aunt, cousin, mother, daughter, or other relative
of an intended parent may serve as gestational carriers subject to all eligibility
requirements of this Chapter and the following additional provisions which are
mandatory and shall not be waived by agreement of the parties:
(1) The gestational carrier and the intended parent or intended parents shall
be represented by independent legal counsel with no familial, financial, or
professional relationship to one another. The gestational carrier's attorney shall, in
addition to the review required by R.S. 9:2720.1(A)(5), specifically advise the
gestational carrier in writing on the heightened potential for family pressure, the
long-term relational consequences of serving as a familial gestational carrier, and the
gestational carrier's absolute right to withdraw at any time before embryo transfer
without legal obligation to any family member. A copy of the attorney's written
advice shall be appended to the agreement.
(2) In addition to the two mandatory counseling sessions required by R.S.
9:2720.2(A), a familial carrier shall complete a third individual counseling session
specifically focused on the relational dynamics of the familial arrangement including
potential for family pressure, boundary-setting, post-birth relationship expectations,
and long-term emotional considerations. The third session shall be conducted by the
same licensed mental health professional who conducted the mandatory sessions, or
a different licensed mental health professional chosen by the carrier, and shall occur
after execution of the agreement and no later than seven days before the
commencement of any embryo transfer procedure. A certification of the third
session shall be provided in the same form as required by R.S. 9:2720.2(A)(3) and
(A)(4) and transmitted to the agency or, in a non-agency arrangement, to both parties'
counsel, before the transfer is scheduled.
(3) The licensed mental health professional conducting the gestational
carrier's counseling sessions shall specifically assess and make a written finding on
whether there are any indicators of family pressure, undue influence, or coercion
associated with the familial relationship. A finding of indicators of coercion that the
Page 13 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
licensed mental health professional cannot certify have been resolved shall disqualify
the arrangement authorized by this Subsection. The licensed mental health
professional's written findings shall be appended to the agreement.
(4) Compensation to a familial carrier is lawful pursuant to R.S. 9:2720.13
and shall not be reduced, conditioned, or structured differently solely because of the
familial relationship. No provision of the agreement may require the carrier to waive
or reduce her compensation because of her family relationship to any intended parent
and any such provision is void as against public policy.
(5) When a licensed gestational carrier agency facilitates a familial
arrangement, the agency shall include in the disclosure packet required by R.S.
40:101, et seq. that the arrangement is a familial carrier arrangement, the safeguards
apply through this Subsection, and the agency has independently confirmed that the
gestational carrier's decision to proceed was voluntary and free from coercion. This
disclosure shall be signed separately by the gestational carrier and shall be retained
in the arrangement file.
§2720.2. Mandatory counseling sessions
A. No embryo transfer procedure may be commenced in furtherance of the
arrangement, unless after execution of the gestational carrier agreement and prior to
the commencement of any embryo transfer procedure, the gestational carrier certifies
in writing under penalty of perjury that she has undergone at least two counseling
sessions with a licensed mental health professional to discuss the gestational carrier
arrangement pursuant to all of the following requirements:
(1) Both required counseling sessions shall be conducted at least thirty days
apart. No embryo transfer procedure shall commence until the second session is
completed and certified.
(2) Both counseling sessions shall be conducted by a licensed mental health
professional who has professional training or experience in third-party reproduction,
gestational carrier arrangements, or reproductive psychology and has no financial
relationship with, is not employed by, and has not been referred to the gestational
Page 14 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
carrier by the intended parent or intended parents or any gestational carrier agency
involved in the arrangement.
(3) The counseling sessions shall address the following topics:
(a) The nature, risks, and process of gestational carrier arrangements
including medical procedures involved.
(b) The legal relationship between the gestational carrier and the intended
parent or intended parents and the child including the relinquishment of parental
rights.
(c) The psychological and emotional effects that may arise during and after
the pregnancy including potential attachment to the child and the experience of
relinquishment.
(d) The gestational carrier's right to make independent medical decisions
during the pregnancy including the right to refuse termination of the pregnancy as
provided in R.S. 9:2720.9.
(e) The gestational carrier's rights with respect to compensation, expenses,
and escrow.
(f) Any psychological contraindications or risk factors identified during the
sessions.
(4) The licensed mental health professional shall, upon completion of the
two required sessions, prepare and sign a written report that, identify each session
by date and duration, confirm that the sessions were conducted at least thirty days
apart, confirm that the mandatory topics in Paragraph (A)(3) of this Section were
discussed, identify any psychological contraindications or concerns observed, and
state that in the professional's clinical judgment, the gestational carrier demonstrated
understanding of the arrangement and the absence of any condition impairing her
capacity to give free and informed consent. The written report shall be signed by the
gestational carrier acknowledging its accuracy and appended to the gestational
carrier agreement.
Page 15 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(5) The gestational carrier shall execute a written certification in the form
pursuant to R.S. 40:111, stating that she has undergone at least two counseling
sessions satisfying the requirements of this Section, the dates and the name and
license number of the licensed mental health professional for each session, both
sessions were conducted at least thirty days apart, the mandatory topics were
addressed, and she freely and voluntarily enters into the gestational carrier
agreement. This certification shall be appended to the gestational carrier agreement.
B. If the gestational carrier has a spouse who is required to execute the
gestational carrier agreement pursuant to R.S. 9:2720.1, the spouse shall also
undergo at least two counseling sessions at least thirty days apart with a licensed
mental health professional satisfying the qualifications of Paragraph (A)(2) of this
Section. The sessions shall address the same mandatory topics prescribed in
Paragraph (A)(3) of this Section as applicable to the spouse's role in the arrangement.
A written report and certification shall be prepared and executed as provided in
Paragraphs (A)(4) and (5) of this Section and appended to the gestational carrier
agreement.
C. No embryo transfer procedure shall commence in furtherance of the
arrangement unless, after execution of the gestational carrier agreement and prior to
the commencement of any embryo transfer procedure, each intended parent certifies
in writing that he, she, or they have undergone at least two counseling sessions with
a licensed mental health professional pursuant to all of the following requirements:
(1) Both required counseling sessions shall be conducted at least thirty days
apart. No embryo transfer procedure shall commence until the second session is
completed and certified.
(2) Both counseling sessions shall be conducted by a licensed mental health
professional meeting the qualifications in Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section.
(3) The counseling sessions shall address the following topics:
(a) The medical processes and risks associated with gestational carrier
arrangements.
Page 16 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(b) The legal rights, responsibilities, and parental relationship of the
intended parent or intended parents with respect to the child.
(c) The psychological and emotional dimensions of third-party reproduction,
including attachment, loss, and ongoing relationship considerations with the
gestational carrier.
(d) The gestational carrier's absolute right to make independent medical
decisions during the pregnancy including the right to refuse termination pursuant to
R.S. 9:2720.9 and the implications of that right for the intended parents.
(e) Realistic expectations regarding outcomes including the possibility that
an embryo transfer may not result in pregnancy or live birth.
(4) The licensed mental health professional shall prepare and sign a written
report as described in Paragraph (A)(4) of this Section adapted for intended parent
or intended parents. Each intended parent shall execute a written certification in the
form prescribed by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health stating that
the intended parent or intended parents have completed two counseling sessions
satisfying the requirements of this Subsection, including the dates and the name and
license number of the licensed mental health professional for each session. The
certification shall be appended to the gestational carrier agreement.
D. One of the required counseling sessions for each party may, in the
discretion of the licensed mental health professional, be conducted jointly with the
other party or parties. However, a joint session does not satisfy more than one of
the two required sessions for any individual party. Each party shall still complete not
fewer than one session individually without other party present in order to ensure
independent reflection and disclosure.
E. The cost of all counseling sessions required by this Section shall be the
sole obligation of the intended parent or intended parents and shall not be deducted
from or offset against the gestational carrier's base compensation. Payment shall be
made as follows:
Page 17 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(1) When a licensed gestational carrier agency is facilitating the
arrangement, the intended parent or intended parents shall deposit into the agency's
pre-execution counseling fund before the first counseling session of any party
commences an amount sufficient to cover the estimated cost of all mandatory
counseling sessions for the gestational carrier, the gestational carrier's spouse if
applicable, and the intended parent or intended parents as set forth in the
parents-agency enrollment agreement required by R.S. 9:2720(15). The agency shall
disburse counseling fees directly to each licensed mental health professional on
behalf of the party being counseled from the pre-execution counseling fund within
five business days after each session. Any unused portion of the pre-execution
counseling fund shall be credited toward the escrow account established by R.S.
40:106 upon execution of the agreement or returned to the intended parents within
fifteen days if the arrangement does not proceed to execution. The pre-execution
counseling fund shall be held in a separate subaccount separated from agency
operating funds and subject to the same fiduciary obligations as client funds as
provided for in R.S. 40:106.
(2) Where no licensed gestational carrier agency is involved, the intended
parent or intended parents shall pay counseling costs directly to each licensed mental
health professional. The gestational carrier agreement shall include an express
obligation of the intended parents to pay all counseling costs and shall specify the
timing of payment. If the carrier or her spouse incurs any counseling cost before
execution, the intended parents shall reimburse the costs in full at or before
execution of the agreement as a condition of the gestational carrier's obligation to
proceed.
(3) No party shall condition or pressure the gestational carrier to select a
specific licensed mental health professional, select a counselor on behalf of the
gestational carrier, or pay counseling fees directly to the gestational carrier's
counselor in any manner that creates a financial relationship or conflict of interest
Page 18 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
between the counselor and the intended parents or any agency involved in the
arrangement.
F. If counseling required by this Section has not been completed before the
commencement of an embryo transfer procedure, the gestational carrier may elect
to void the agreement and refuse to proceed with the transfer without liability to any
party. After an embryo transfer resulting in pregnancy has been performed,
noncompliance with this Section shall not render the agreement void or
unenforceable as to any parentage determination, but shall give rise to an
independent ground for disciplinary action against any gestational carrier agency that
facilitated the arrangement pursuant to R.S. 40:101 et seq. and a private cause of
action for damages by the gestational carrier against the party or agency responsible
for the noncompliance including recovery of all counseling costs, attorney's fees, and
any other actual damages sustained.
G. The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health shall prescribe
model certification forms for use by gestational carriers, gestational carriers' spouses,
and intended parents under this Section within one hundred eighty days of the
effective date of this Act. Use of the prescribed model form shall be deemed to
satisfy the certification requirement of this Section. The model forms shall be
published on the department's website and made available to all parties, licensed
healthcare providers, licensed mental health professionals, and gestational carrier
agencies.
H. Where a licensed gestational carrier agency is facilitating the
arrangement:
(1) The agency shall inform the gestational carrier in writing the counseling
requirements of this Section and the gestational carrier's right to select her own
qualified licensed mental health professional, the gestational carrier's right to receive
all counseling fees from escrow without those fees being deducted from her base
compensation, and the agency's own financial relationships, if any, with any licensed
mental health professional to whom the carrier may be referred.
Page 19 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(2) The agency shall retain, in the arrangement file, a copy of the written
counseling certifications required by Subsections (A)(4),A(5) and (C)(4) for not less
than ten years. The agency shall verify that all required certifications have been
obtained and are on file before authorizing or coordinating the commencement of
any embryo transfer procedure.
(3) The agency shall not select, retain, compensate, or direct the licensed
mental health professional who counsels the gestational carrier. Any referral by the
agency of a licensed mental health professional to the gestational carrier shall be
accompanied by full written disclosure of any financial, employment, or referral-fee
relationship between the agency and the professional consistent with R.S. 40:113.
(4) Violation of this Subsection by a licensed gestational carrier agency
constitutes an independent ground for disciplinary action in accordance with R.S.
40:120 and a private cause of action by the gestational carrier in accordance with
R.S. 40:124, regardless of whether the underlying gestational carrier agreement is
otherwise compliant and enforceable.
§2720.3. Required terms; necessary parties; medically necessary
A. Every gestational carrier agreement shall contain, at a minimum, all of
the following terms to be enforceable pursuant to this Chapter:
(1) The gestational carrier's agreement to become pregnant by means of in
utero embryo transfer using the gametes of at least one of the intended parents, and
to give birth to the resulting child.
(2) The gestational carrier's agreement to reasonable medical evaluation and
treatment during the pregnancy, to adhere to reasonable medical instructions about
prenatal health, and to execute medical-records releases in favor of the intended
parent or intended parents.
(3) Proof that the gestational carrier has completed at least two counseling
sessions at least thirty days apart with a licensed mental health professional as
required by R.S. 9:2720.2.
Page 20 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(4) A certification by the gestational carrier and, if she is married, by her
spouse, that she and her spouse, if applicable, will relinquish all parental rights and
duties to any child born from the in utero embryo transfer.
(5) The gestational carrier's agreement to attend at least one post-birth
counseling session within six months following the birth of the child as provided in
R.S. 9:2720.8.
B. The following persons shall each be named as a party to the gestational
carrier agreement and, where applicable, to any parentage proceeding provided by
this Chapter:
(1) The gestational carrier.
(2) The intended parent or intended parents.
(3) The gestational carrier's spouse, if she is married at the time of execution
of the agreement.
§2720.4. Gestational carrier agency; required licensure
A. No person or entity may operate as a gestational carrier agency as defined
in R.S. 40:103 within this state or in connection with any covered arrangement
pursuant to this Chapter, unless the person or entity holds a current valid license
issued by the Louisiana Department of Health. The Louisiana Department of Health
license is a prerequisite to the solicitation, recruitment, matching, or financial
management of any gestational carrier arrangement involving a gestational carrier
or intended parent or intended parents residing in this state or an embryo transfer or
birth occurring in this state regardless of the state of the agency's domicile or
principal place of business.
B. Operation as a gestational carrier agency without a license issued in
accordance with R.S. 40:101 et seq. does not void or render unenforceable any
underlying gestational carrier agreement that otherwise complies with the
requirements of this Chapter. However, unlicensed operation subjects the agency
and its principals to the civil, administrative, and criminal penalties prescribed in
R.S. 40:101 et seq. and to the private right of action set forth in R.S. 40:124.
Page 21 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
C. The licensing standards, application requirements, financial protections,
disclosure obligations, enforcement mechanisms, and penalties applicable to
gestational carrier agencies are set forth in Chapter 2-B of Title 40, R.S. 40:101
through 127. Nothing in this Section limits the authority of the Louisiana
Department of Health to establish additional requirements by rule pursuant to R.S.
40:126.
§2720.5. Agency compliance obligations; background check; safety
A. Before proceeding with any match or referral, a licensed gestational
carrier agency shall verify and document in writing that all requirements of R.S.
9:2720 through 9:2720.3 have been satisfied with respect to the gestational carrier,
her spouse if married, and the intended parent or intended parents. The agency shall
retain documentation of this verification in the arrangement file for not less than ten
years from the date of the last service provided in connection with the arrangement.
B. Before completing any match, a licensed gestational carrier agency shall
conduct and document the following background check and safety investigations
with respect to the gestational carrier, her spouse if married, and the intended parent
or intended parents:
(1) A search of criminal records through the Louisiana State Police and any
other state or federal database applicable to each individual's state of residence and
prior states of residence together with a check of the Louisiana Protective Order
Registry and any validated complaints of child abuse or neglect maintained by the
Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services or equivalent agency. No
match shall proceed if there is a risk of harm to the child or gestational carrier.
(2) A search of the Louisiana Central Registry for child abuse and neglect
and where any party has resided in another state within the preceding ten years a
corresponding check of that state's child abuse and neglect registry. No match shall
proceed if any party has a validated finding of child abuse or neglect that has not
been successfully expunged or set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction.
Page 22 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(3) A check of the Louisiana Protective Order Registry for each party. The
existence of any active protective order naming a party as a respondent shall
constitute a disqualifying finding unless the agency obtains a written opinion from
an independent licensed attorney that the protective order does not present a risk of
harm to the gestational carrier or the child and the agency documents this
determination in the arrangement file.
(4) A check of the Louisiana Sex Offender and Child Predator Registry and
the National Sex Offender Public Website for each party. Registration as a sex
offender is an absolute disqualifying finding. No match may proceed regardless of
the nature of the underlying offense or the date of conviction.
C. No licensed gestational carrier agency may proceed with a match or
referral unless, based on the investigations required by Subsection B of this Section,
the agency determines and documents an affirmative written finding that the reports
of criminal records, validated complaints of child abuse or neglect, and Louisiana
Protective Order Registry checks show that there is no risk of harm to the child or
the gestational carrier. This finding shall be signed by the agency's designated
qualified person as defined in R.S. 40:105, dated, and retained in the arrangement
file.
D. If more than one hundred eighty days elapse between the initial
background-check investigations and the date of embryo transfer, the agency shall
conduct and document updated checks as set forth in Paragraphs (B)(1) through (4)
of this Section before the transfer proceeds.
E. Failure by a licensed gestational carrier agency to conduct or document
the investigations required by this Section or to make the affirmative finding
required by Subsection C of this Section constitutes an independent ground for
license suspension or revocation pursuant to R.S. 40:120 and subjects the agency to
civil penalties provided in R.S. 40:121 and to private civil liability penalties provided
in R.S. 40:124. Noncompliance with this Section does not void or render
Page 23 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
unenforceable any underlying gestational carrier agreement that otherwise satisfies
the requirements of this Chapter.
§2720.6. Gestational carrier agency; party and third-party beneficiary status;
advertising; screening, escrow, fee disclosure, and conflict standards
A. The legislature finds that gestational carrier agencies operating in this
state exercise substantial influence over the formation, content, and performance of
gestational carrier arrangements. The purpose of this Section is to establish a
transparent three-contract architecture for agency-facilitated arrangements that:
(1) Clearly separates the agency's relationship with intended parents from its
relationship with the gestational carrier.
(2) Ensures the gestational carrier enters the operative gestational carrier
agreement on terms she has negotiated through a pre-set compensation grid and
reviewed with independent counsel.
(3) Limits the agency's role in the operative gestational carrier agreement to
administrative functions only.
(4) Fully integrates with R.S. 40:101 et seq.
B. Where a licensed gestational carrier agency facilitates a covered
arrangement, the following three instruments shall govern the arrangement:
(1) A Parents-Agency Enrollment Agreement
(a) The intended parent or intended parents shall execute a parents-agency
enrollment agreement with the licensed gestational carrier agency as defined in R.S.
9:2720(15) before or concurrently with matching.
(b) This instrument governs the relationship between the agency and the
intended parents exclusively and creates no rights or obligations on the part of the
gestational carrier.
(2) Carrier-Agency Engagement Agreement
(a) The gestational carrier shall execute a carrier-agency engagement
agreement with the licensed gestational carrier agency as defined in R.S. 9:2720(16)
before or concurrently with matching.
Page 24 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(b) This instrument governs the relationship between the agency and the
gestational carrier exclusively and creates no direct rights or obligations on the part
of the intended parents. The carrier-agency engagement agreement shall be reviewed
by the gestational carrier's independent legal counsel before execution and the
agency shall allow not less than five business days between presenting the agreement
to the carrier and the execution date.
(c) No provision of this instrument may waive, reduce, or condition any
statutory right of the gestational carrier pursuant to this Chapter.
(3) Agency-Coordinated Gestational Carrier Agreement
(a) Following a successful match, the licensed gestational carrier agency
shall produce, coordinate, and submit an agency-coordinated gestational carrier
agreement as defined in R.S. 9:2720(17) for execution by the intended parent or
intended parents, the gestational carrier, and, if applicable, the gestational carrier's
spouse.
(b) This is the operative legal instrument governing the arrangement. The
agency's role in this instrument is limited to the administrative functions specified
in R.S. 9:2720(17)(d).
(c) The agency is not a signatory party, does not acquire parental or custodial
rights, and shall not enforce any provision of the agency-coordinated gestational
carrier agreement against the gestational carrier except through the regulatory
remedies of R.S. 40:101 et seq.
C. In the event of any conflict among the three instruments:
(1) The agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement controls over both
the parents-agency enrollment agreement and the carrier-agency engagement
agreement as to all rights and obligations of the gestational carrier with respect to the
intended parents.
(2) The carrier-agency engagement agreement controls over the
parents-agency enrollment agreement as to the terms of the pre-set compensation
grid incorporated into the agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement.
Page 25 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(3) No provision of either the parents-agency enrollment agreement or the
carrier-agency engagement agreement may reduce any statutory protection of the
gestational carrier below the minimum established by this Chapter.
D. All advertising by a licensed gestational carrier agency in connection with
a covered arrangement is governed by R.S. 40:109. As a condition of the agency's
recognition pursuant to this Chapter, whether as a signatory party, a third-party
beneficiary, or merely as the facilitating agency in the arrangement file, the agency
shall include its Louisiana Department of Health license number in all advertising
directed at state-resident gestational carriers or state-domiciled intended parents, not
make any representation in advertising regarding the terms, compensation ranges,
or outcomes of gestational carrier arrangements that is inconsistent with the
compensation benchmarks or prohibited conditions of R.S. 9:2720.13 and 9:2720.14,
and not advertise to recruit gestational carriers in a manner that targets or exploits
economically vulnerable persons. A material misrepresentation in agency
advertising that induces a gestational carrier to enter into a covered arrangement
shall constitute grounds for rescission of the gestational carrier agreement as to the
agency, and for a private damages action by the gestational carrier as provided in
R.S. 40:124, without prejudice to the gestational carrier agreement's enforceability
against the intended parents.
E. Agency screening obligations applicable to covered arrangements are
governed in full by R.S. 9:2720.5 and R.S. 40:111. For purposes of the gestational
carrier agreement, a party's signature on the agreement constitutes acknowledgment
that, to the party's knowledge, the agency has provided written documentation of
compliance with the screening requirements of R.S. 9:2720.5. Nondisclosure or
misrepresentation of disqualifying screening findings by the agency shall constitute
fraud in the inducement of the gestational carrier agreement and shall give rise to
rescission rights under R.S. 9:2720.11(A) and damages pursuant to R.S. 40:124.
F.(1) The escrow obligations of a licensed gestational carrier agency in
connection with client funds are governed exclusively by R.S. 40:106 and 40:107.
Page 26 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(2) For purposes of the three instruments governing an agency-facilitated
arrangement:
(a) All funds relating to gestational carrier compensation, expense
reimbursements, insurance reserves, and medical expense reserves shall be deposited
into an independent escrow account before any medical procedure commences.
(b) Agency fees shall be maintained separately from all client funds and may
not be disbursed from the client escrow account.
(c) The gestational carrier's right to receive disbursements on schedule under
the agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement is a contractual right
enforceable directly against the agency under both this Chapter and R.S. 40:106.
(d) Any provision in any of the three instruments purporting to condition or
delay disbursement of base compensation or expense reimbursements on any event
other than the agreed schedule is void as against public policy under R.S.
9:2720.13(B).
G. Fee disclosure obligations of a licensed gestational carrier agency are
governed by R.S. 40:2199.10. The parents-agency enrollment agreement shall: (1)
separately itemize agency fees, third-party service fees, estimated gestational carrier
compensation from the pre-set grid, and escrow administration fees; (2) state the
agency's complete refund policy in plain language, including the specific
circumstances and timeframes under which any fee will be refunded; (3) disclose any
fee-sharing, referral-fee, revenue-sharing, or other financial arrangement between the
agency and any attorney, healthcare provider, or mental health professional involved
in the arrangement; and (4) disclose any financial interest the agency, or any
principal of the agency, holds in any business that provides services billed to the
intended parents in connection with the arrangement. Failure to make any of the
disclosures required by this Subsection renders any undisclosed fee voidable at the
election of the intended parents and subjects the agency to private damages liability
under R.S. 40:124.
Page 27 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
H. For purposes of the three instruments, the following conflict-of-interest
rules apply:
(1) No agency may control, directly or indirectly, the selection of
independent legal counsel for the gestational carrier, the intended parents, or the
gestational carrier's spouse.
(2) No agency may receive any financial benefit from, or have any financial
interest in, any legal, medical, or mental health service billed to any party in
connection with the arrangement, except as fully disclosed in the parents-agency
enrollment agreement.
(3) No attorney who owns, controls, manages, or is employed by or
contracted with a licensed gestational carrier agency may represent any party to an
agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement facilitated by that agency.
(4) No provision of any of the three instruments may purport to waive the
foregoing conflict rules on behalf of the gestational carrier.
(5) A violation of this Subsection by the agency constitutes grounds for
rescission of the parents-agency enrollment agreement and/or the carrier-agency
engagement agreement, and for a private damages action pursuant to R.S. 40:124,
without prejudice to the agency-coordinated gestational carrier agreement's
enforceability between the principal parties.
I. A gestational carrier who suffers harm as a result of the agency's violation
of this Section or any provision of R.S. 9:2720.2(H), R.S. 9:2720.4, R.S. 9:2720.5,
or R.S. 40:101 et seq. may bring a direct civil action against the agency under R.S.
40:124 regardless of the agency's role under any of the three instruments. The
agency may not invoke any provision of any of the three instruments to limit, waive,
or arbitrate the gestational carrier's statutory rights under R.S. 40:124.
J. The standards set forth in this Section operate concurrently with, and do
not supersede or limit, the licensing requirements, operational standards,
enforcement mechanisms, and penalties of R.S. 40:101 et seq. In the event of a
conflict between a provision of this Section and a provision of Chapter 2-B of Title
Page 28 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
40, R.S. 40:101 through 127, the provision that affords greater protection to the
gestational carrier shall control. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit
the authority of the Louisiana Department of Health to promulgate rules establishing
additional standards for licensed gestational carrier agencies under R.S. 40:126.
§2720.7. Intended parents eligibility
A. Each intended parent shall:
(1) Agree to complete the mandatory counseling sessions required by R.S.
9:2720.2(C) after execution of the agreement and prior to any embryo transfer
procedure, as evidenced by the agreement's inclusion of the counseling obligation
required by R.S. 9:2723(C).
(2) Receive independent legal advice from a licensed attorney regarding the
terms and legal consequences of the agreement.
(3) Undergo background screening as required by the medical facility
performing the embryo transfer.
B. An intended parent or intended parents shall demonstrate financial
capacity to meet all obligations under the gestational carrier agreement including full
compensation to the gestational carrier, all medical and insurance costs, legal costs,
escrow funding, and all other expenses required by R.S. 9:2720.13. This
requirement is satisfied by meeting the applicable income threshold as provided by
this Section and verified by documentation as provided in this Subsection:
(1) A single intended parent shall demonstrate gross annual income of not
less than eighty thousand dollars from the intended parent's own employment,
self-employment, or investment income in the most recently completed calendar
year. For purposes of this Subparagraph, "single intended parent" means an intended
parent who is not married and is not entering into the agreement jointly with a
co-intended parent.
(2) Where two intended parents enter into the agreement jointly the
combined gross annual income of both intended parents shall be not less than one
Page 29 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
hundred fifty thousand dollars from their combined employment, self-employment
or investment income in the most recently completed calendar year.
(3) The income threshold shall be verified by a signed federal income tax
return. Documentation shall be reviewed and retained by the licensed gestational
carrier agency under R.S. 40:115, or, in a non-agency arrangement, by the intended
parents' independent legal counsel and shall be appended to the compliance file.
(4) An intended parent who does not satisfy the applicable income threshold
may petition the Louisiana Department of Health or apply to a district court in a
declaratory judgment action for a waiver upon a showing that the intended parent has
sufficient assets, insurance, or other financial resources to meet all obligations under
the agreement without material risk of default. A waiver shall be granted only upon
a finding supported by financial documentation reviewed by an independent financial
professional. The escrow pre-funding requirement of R.S. 40:106 shall in all cases
be satisfied regardless of whether a waiver is sought.
(5) The income thresholds established in this Subsection are not intended to
and shall not be construed to discriminate on the basis of race, national origin,
disability, or any other protected characteristic. The income thresholds reflect the
legislature's determination that there is financial capacity sufficient to meet all
obligations to the gestational carrier including full escrow pre-funding of
compensation and expenses. This is a prerequisite to entering into a covered
arrangement and is subject to the waiver Paragraph (4) of this Section. The
Louisiana Department of Health shall, pursuant to R.S. 40:126, review the income
thresholds by rule not less than every four years to determine whether adjustment is
warranted based on changes in the cost of covered arrangements.
PART III - THE GESTATIONAL CARRIER AGREEMENT
§2720.8. Required content
A. A gestational carrier agreement shall be in writing, signed by all parties
in the presence of a notary public and two competent adult witnesses, and notarized.
The agreement shall include, at a minimum, all of the following general provisions:
Page 30 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(1) The full legal names, dates of birth, and addresses of all parties.
(2) Identification of the licensed healthcare provider or clinic responsible for
the assisted reproduction procedure.
(3) A description of the medical procedures to be performed and the number
of embryo transfer attempts authorized.
(4) A detailed schedule of all compensation, if any, and reimbursement of
reasonable expenses, including the timing of payments and the identity of the escrow
agent.
(5) Proof of health, life, and disability insurance coverage for the gestational
carrier throughout the pregnancy and for not less than twelve months postpartum, or
an agreement by the intended parent or intended parents to obtain and maintain such
coverage.
(6) Provisions addressing disposition of embryos in the event of the death
or incapacity of any party or dissolution of the intended parents' relationship prior
to birth.
(7) Acknowledgment that each party has received independent legal counsel
and has agreed to complete the mandatory counseling sessions required by R.S.
9:2720.2 after execution and prior to any embryo transfer procedure, with cost
obligations as specified in R.S. 9:2720.2(D).
B. In addition to the provisions required by Subsection A of this Section, in
every enforceable gestational carrier agreement the gestational carrier shall agree to,
and the agreement must contain, each of the following terms:
(1) The gestational carrier agrees to become pregnant by means of in utero
embryo transfer using the gametes of at least one of the intended parents, or gametes
from a donor approved by the intended parent or intended parents where neither
intended parent contributes gametes, and to carry and give birth to the resulting child
or children.
(2) The gestational carrier agrees to:
Page 31 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(a) Submit to reasonable medical evaluation and treatment during the
pregnancy as recommended by her attending licensed healthcare provider.\
(b) Adhere to reasonable medical instructions about prenatal health,
including but not limited to prenatal care appointments, prescribed medications,
dietary and lifestyle recommendations made by her healthcare provider, and
avoidance of substances known to be harmful to fetal development.
(c) Execute medical-records releases in favor of the intended parent or
intended parents to the extent necessary to allow the intended parents to receive
information about the pregnancy and the health of the child. Nothing in this
provision shall be construed to require the gestational carrier to undergo any medical
procedure against her will, and all medical decision-making authority remains with
the gestational carrier as further provided in Paragraph (C)(1) of this Section.
(3) The gestational carrier certifies that, prior to or concurrently with
execution of the agreement, she has disclosed to the licensed healthcare provider
who issued the medical clearance required by R.S. 9:2720.1 a complete and accurate
medical history covering all categories specified in that provision, and that the
clearance letter appended to this agreement reflects that review. The gestational
carrier further agrees that during the term of this agreement she will promptly
disclose to her attending licensed healthcare provider, and authorize disclosure to the
treating reproductive endocrinologist and, to the extent medically relevant, to the
intended parent or intended parents, any material change in her medical condition,
mental health status, or substance use that arises after execution and that could
reasonably affect the safety of the pregnancy, the health of the child, or the
gestational carrier's ability to fulfill her obligations under this agreement. Disclosure
to the intended parents under this provision is limited to information that is medically
relevant to the pregnancy and the child, is made through the attending healthcare
provider, and is subject to the confidentiality protections and applicable federal law.
The gestational carrier's obligation to disclose under this provision does not alter her
medical decision-making authority as provided in R.S. 9:2720.8, and no disclosure
Page 32 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
required herein may be used as a basis to condition, reduce, or withhold any
compensation to which the carrier is entitled under this agreement.
(4) The gestational carrier agrees, and certifies her agreement in writing
under penalty of perjury, that after execution of this agreement and prior to the
commencement of any embryo transfer procedure she will undergo at least two
counseling sessions at least thirty days apart, with a licensed mental health
professional satisfying the qualifications of R.S. 9:2720.2(A)(2), to discuss the
gestational carrier arrangement. The certification of completion, in the form
prescribed by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health, shall be executed
after the sessions are completed and shall be provided to the agency or, in a
non-agency arrangement, to both parties' counsel, before any embryo transfer
procedure is scheduled.
(5) The gestational carrier certifies, and if she is married her spouse also
certifies, that she and her spouse, if applicable, will relinquish all parental rights and
duties to any child born from the in utero embryo transfer, and will not assert any
claim to parentage of such child. This certification shall be executed in the form
prescribed by the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health and shall be
appended to the agreement.
(6) The gestational carrier agrees to attend at least two post-birth counseling
sessions with a licensed mental health professional within six months of the birth of
the child. Post-birth counseling sessions shall address, at minimum, the gestational
carrier's emotional and psychological adjustment following the birth and
relinquishment, and any support needs identified by the licensed mental health
professional. The cost of all post-birth counseling sessions required by this provision
shall be paid by the intended parent or intended parents from escrow or directly, and
shall be treated as a reasonable expense under the agreement.
C. In every enforceable gestational carrier agreement, the intended parent or
intended parents must certify in writing that they agree to each of the following
terms:
Page 33 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(1) The gestational carrier and the intended parent or intended parents
acknowledge that medical decisions during the pregnancy shall be made jointly by
the gestational carrier and the intended parent or intended parents to the greatest
extent practicable. In the event the gestational carrier and the intended parent or
intended parents cannot agree on a medical decision, the final decision regarding any
medical procedure, treatment, or intervention relating to the pregnancy shall be made
by the gestational carrier's attending obstetrician or other treating licensed physician,
who shall exercise independent clinical judgment as to what course of action is
conducive to the health and well-being of both the gestational carrier and the unborn
child or children. No provision of the agreement shall override or limit this
allocation of decision-making authority. The absolute prohibition on requiring the
gestational carrier to consent to termination of a pregnancy, regardless of any
disagreement between the parties, is separately governed by R.S. 9:2720.9.
(2) The intended parent or intended parents agree to accept physical custody
of and assume full parental rights and responsibilities for the child immediately upon
birth, regardless of any physical or mental impairment of the child, and regardless
of any impairment, condition, or characteristic of the child that was not anticipated
at the time the agreement was executed.
(3) The intended parent or intended parents agree to be recognized as the
sole legal parent or parents of the child born through the gestational carrier
arrangement, and to take all steps necessary to establish and record that legal
parentage, including cooperating in the administrative pre-parentage certification
process under R.S. 9:2720.16 and any judicial parentage proceeding the parties may
elect to bring.
(4) Where there are two intended parents, both intended parents shall have
in place, before the gestational carrier agreement is executed, a valid will or other
legally effective succession or custody plan, executed in accordance with the laws
of this state or the jurisdiction of their domicile, that meets all of the following
criteria:
Page 34 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(a) Identifies the individual or individuals who would assume custody of and
parental responsibility for the child in the event both intended parents die before the
birth of the child or within a period specified in the agreement following birth.
(b) Makes express provision for the child's care and support in such event.
(c) Is not revocable without simultaneously executing a replacement plan
satisfying the requirements of this provision. Where there is a single intended
parent, that intended parent shall have in place a valid will or succession plan
identifying a guardian for the child in the event the intended parent dies before or
shortly after the birth of the child. Proof of the existence of such a will or succession
plan, in the form of a written certification by an independent licensed attorney, shall
be appended to the gestational carrier agreement at execution.
D. No provision of the agreement shall limit the gestational carrier's right to
make medical decisions regarding her own body, except as modified by the joint
decision-making framework of Paragraph (C)(1) of this Section, compel her to
engage in conduct she objects to on medical advice, or waive any party's right to seek
judicial determination of any disputed matter.
§2720.9. Prohibition on termination of pregnancy
A. No gestational carrier agreement, amendment, addendum, side letter, or
any other instrument executed in connection with a gestational carrier arrangement
may require, compel, coerce, incentivize, or in any manner obligate a gestational
carrier to consent to or undergo termination of a pregnancy. This prohibition applies
without limitation or qualification to termination sought or requested for any reason,
including but not limited to:
(1) Prenatal diagnosis of a disability, disorder, or disease.
(2) The presence of a genetic variation or chromosomal condition.
(3) A fetal health condition or prognosis.
(4) Sex selection or selection based on any other physical characteristic of
the fetus.
(5) Fetal reduction in a multiple-gestation pregnancy.
Page 35 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
B. Any provision of a gestational carrier agreement that purports to require,
compel, or obligate the gestational carrier to terminate a pregnancy, or to impose any
penalty, forfeiture of compensation, reduction of reimbursement, or other adverse
consequence upon the gestational carrier for refusing to terminate a pregnancy, is
absolutely null and of no legal effect. Such a provision shall not be ratified, cured,
or enforced by agreement of the parties, by subsequent conduct, or by any other
means. The absolute nullity of such a provision shall not affect the validity of the
remainder of the gestational carrier agreement which shall be construed as if the null
provision had never been included.
C. No party to a gestational carrier agreement, and no gestational carrier
agency or other intermediary, shall threaten, penalize, condition, or otherwise take
adverse action against a gestational carrier by reason of her refusal to terminate a
pregnancy, regardless of the terms of any agreement. Any such threat, conditioning,
or adverse action shall constitute an independent ground for rescission of the
gestational carrier agreement and shall give rise to a cause of action for damages
under this Chapter and under R.S. 40:101 et seq.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to compel, authorize, or
prohibit the gestational carrier from independently electing to terminate a pregnancy
in the exercise of her own medical decision-making authority.
§2720.10. Execution; timing; interstate effect
A. The agreement shall be executed before any assisted reproduction
procedure is performed. At least fifteen calendar days shall elapse between the
gestational carrier's receipt of the final proposed agreement and the date of
execution. All signatures shall be obtained in the presence of a notary public
licensed in this state and two competent adult witnesses, who shall also sign the
agreement in the presence of the notary public.
B. An agreement executed in compliance with the laws of another state shall
be given full faith and credit if it substantially complies with the requirements of this
Chapter.
Page 36 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§2720.11. Enforceability; administrative and judicial
A. A gestational carrier agreement that is in the statutory form required by
this Chapter and that satisfies either of the conditions set forth in Subsection B of this
Section is enforceable as a contract in accordance with state law. An agreement that
does not satisfy either condition is not automatically void but may be subject to
rescission, reformation, or equitable relief, with the best interests of any resulting
child as the paramount consideration.
B. A gestational carrier agreement is enforceable if it satisfies either of the
following conditions:
(1) The agreement has been handled through a licensed gestational carrier
agency and the Louisiana Department of Health has issued a Louisiana Department
of Health Compliance Certificate for the agreement certifying that the agreement is
in the statutory form required by this Chapter and that the requirements of R.S.
9:2720 through 9:2720.6 have been satisfied.
(2) A court of competent jurisdiction has entered an order confirming that
the agreement complies with this Chapter and is enforceable, in a declaratory
judgment action brought under Code of Civil Procedure Article 1871 et seq. or in
any other civil proceeding in which parentage or enforceability is at issue.
C. An agreement for which the Louisiana Department of Health Compliance
Certificate has been issued under R.S. 9:2720.12 is presumed valid and enforceable
as between the parties. The presumption is rebuttable by clear and convincing
evidence of fraud, duress, material misrepresentation, or a violation of the absolute
prohibitions of this Chapter. The presumption does not preclude any party from
seeking judicial relief provided for in Subsection F of this Section or from raising
any constitutional challenge in a district court.
D. A gestational carrier agreement shall not be rescinded by any party after
a licensed healthcare provider has performed an embryo transfer that results in
pregnancy, regardless of whether the agreement holds a Louisiana Department of
Health compliance certificate or a judicial confirmation order. Specific performance
Page 37 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
is available as a remedy for breach, except that no court shall order a gestational
carrier to submit to a medical procedure against her will or to continue or terminate
a pregnancy.
E. The intended parent or intended parents are solely responsible for all
reasonable and agreed-upon expenses arising from the agreement regardless of
whether a live birth results regardless of whether an administrative proceeding of
court proceeding is used to establish enforceability and regardless of whether an the
Louisiana Department of Health compliance certificate has been issued.
F. Issuance of a Louisiana Department of Health compliance certificate and
Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification does not preclude, and shall not be
construed to limit, any party's right to seek a judicial parentage determination from
a district court of competent jurisdiction, bring an action in district court for
rescission, reformation, equitable relief, or damages under this Chapter or applicable
state contract law, challenge the constitutional validity of the agreement or of this
Chapter in district court, or seek judicial review of any Louisiana Department of
Health administrative action in accordance with the Louisiana Administrative
Procedure Act in a court of appeal exercising appellate jurisdiction over the
Louisiana Department of Health regulatory determination that is not itself a civil
matter within Article V, Section 16(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana. A judicial
parentage order supersedes any Louisiana Department of Health compliance
certificate or Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification as to the legal parentage of
any child born from the arrangement.
§2720.12. The Louisiana Department of Health Administrative Compliance
Certificate
A. The Louisiana Department of Health Administrative compliance
certificate is an administrative determination that a gestational carrier agreement
submitted through a licensed gestational carrier agency is in the statutory form
required by this Chapter and that the agency has documented satisfaction of the
requirements of R.S. 9:2720 through 9:2720.6. The certificate is a regulatory
Page 38 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
compliance determination within the Louisiana Department of Health's licensing and
oversight authority and is not a civil matter within Article V, Section 16(A) of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
B. A licensed gestational carrier agency may, after execution of the
agreement and at least fifteen days before the commencement of any embryo transfer
procedure, submit to the Louisiana Department of Health through the registered
portal established pursuant to R.S. 40:101 et seq.:
(1) A copy of the fully executed agency-coordinated gestational carrier
agreement, with all exhibits and certifications attached.
(2) The agency's written compliance verification and the background-check
findings required by R.S. 9:2720.5.
(3) The counseling certifications required by this Chapter.
(4) Documentation of independent legal counsel for all parties.
(5) The two signed physician opinions establishing medical necessity, if
applicable under R.S. 9:2720.3.
(6) Confirmation that the parents-agency enrollment agreement required by
and the carrier-agency engagement agreement required by R.S. 9:2720.2 have been
executed and are on file with the agency.
C. The Louisiana Department of Health shall review the submitted materials
and within thirty calendar days of receipt of a complete submission:
(1) Issue a compliance certificate if the materials demonstrate compliance
with R.S. 9:2720 through 9:2720.6 and the agreement is in the required statutory
form.
(2) Issue a deficiency notice identifying with specificity each requirement
not satisfied and providing fifteen days to cure.
(3) Deny the compliance certificate with a written statement of reasons. An
agreement is deemed "complete" for purposes of this Section when the Louisiana
Department of Health has received all items listed in Subsection B of this Section.
Page 39 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
The Louisiana Department of Health's failure to act within thirty days of a complete
submission shall be deemed a denial reviewable under R.S. 49:964.
D. A compliance certificate does all of the following:
(1) Constitutes the administrative determination that the agreement satisfies
the statutory form and documentation requirements of this Chapter for purposes of
the presumption of validity under R.S. 9:2720.11.
(2) Together with the Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification issued
simultaneously under R.S. 9:2720.16, establishes sufficient administrative authority
for vital-records staff to list the intended parent or intended parents on the birth
certificate of a child born from the arrangement under R.S. 9:2720.22 absent a
contrary court order.
(3) Is registered in the Louisiana Department of Health Gestational Carrier
Registry set forth in R.S. 40:101 et seq, and is available to the Louisiana Department
of Health, the parties, the parties' legal counsel, treating healthcare providers, and the
vital records registrar.
(4) Does not constitute a parentage order, does not adjudicate legal
parentage, and does not preclude any party from seeking a judicial parentage
determination under R.S. 9:2720.15.
E. The Louisiana Department of Health may revoke or suspend a compliance
certificate upon a finding, following notice and opportunity to be heard under R.S.
49:950 et seq., that the submission contained material misrepresentation, a
disqualifying condition was concealed, or the agreement contains a provision
absolutely null under R.S. 9:2720.9. Revocation or suspension does not affect the
enforceability of the underlying agreement as between the parties if pregnancy has
already resulted from an embryo transfer subject to R.S. 9:2720.11. Any party or
aggrieved person may challenge a revocation, suspension, or denial by petition for
judicial review to the appropriate court of appeal under R.S. 49:964, exercising
appellate jurisdiction over the Louisiana Department of Health's regulatory
determination.
Page 40 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
F. Parties who do not use a licensed gestational carrier agency shall not use
the administrative track under this Section and shall obtain judicial confirmation
pursuant to R.S. 9:2720.11 to establish the presumption of validity. Nothing in this
Section requires any party to use a licensed gestational carrier agency, and no
agreement is rendered unenforceable solely because it was not submitted for a
compliance certificate. Such agreements remain subject to R.S. 9:2720.1 and to
judicial determination of compliance.
§2720.13. Compensation
A. Compensation to a gestational carrier is lawful and enforceable under this
Chapter. The legislature finds that fair and transparent compensation recognizes the
significant physical, emotional, and time commitments undertaken by a gestational
carrier and is consistent with the public policy of this state. All compensation and
all categories of reimbursement shall be separately identified and itemized in the
gestational carrier agreement and deposited into an escrow account maintained by
a licensed attorney or independent escrow agent prior to commencement of any
medical procedure, and disbursed only in accordance with the schedule established
in the agreement and the requirements of R.S. 40:106.
B.(1) Payment of base compensation shall not be conditioned upon, reduced
by reason of, or forfeited as a consequence of any of the following:
(a) Live birth or any specific pregnancy outcome.
(b) The health, appearance, genetic characteristics, or number of children
born.
(c) The gestational carrier's agreement or refusal to undergo selective
reduction or termination of a pregnancy.
(d) Surrender or relinquishment of the child to the intended parent or
intended parents.
(2) Any provision of a gestational carrier agreement that conditions, reduces,
or withholds base compensation on any of the foregoing grounds is void and
unenforceable.
Page 41 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
C. In the ordinary course of a compliant gestational carrier arrangement,
compensation shall be disbursed to the gestational carrier before birth in accordance
with the agreed payment schedule. Amounts not yet disbursed at the time of birth
shall be disbursed promptly following delivery in accordance with the agreement.
The gestational carrier shall not be required to await the outcome of any parentage
proceeding before receiving disbursements to which she is entitled under the
payment schedule.
D. The gestational carrier shall not be required to pay any medical bills
arising from the pregnancy, delivery, or postpartum care out of her own funds. All
costs shall be covered through the health insurance obtained pursuant to R.S.
9:2720.8 and R.S. 40:114 through direct payment by the intended parent or intended
parents or through escrow disbursement as specified in the agreement.
§2720.14. Compensation schedule; benchmarks; required payment
A. The legislature recognizes that based on national market data for similarly
situated states fair gestational carrier compensation in this state falls within the
following benchmark ranges which shall serve as guidance to parties and courts in
evaluating the reasonableness of agreed compensation:
(1) For a gestational carrier who has not previously served as a gestational
carrier, the benchmark range for total compensation is fifty-five thousand dollars to
ninety thousand dollars inclusive of base pay and all allowances, bonuses, and
supplemental payments described in Subsection B of this Section but exclusive of
reimbursement of actual expenses.
(2) For a gestational carrier who has previously completed at least one
gestational carrier arrangement, the benchmark range for total compensation is
sixty-five thousand dollars to one hundred ten thousand dollars reflecting the
demonstrated experience, reliability, and reduced risk associated with a carrier who
has successfully completed a prior arrangement.
B. These benchmarks do not establish a minimum or maximum
compensation required by law. Parties may negotiate compensation outside these
Page 42 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
ranges. However, compensation materially below the lower benchmark shall be
considered a factor in evaluating whether the agreement was entered into freely and
without coercion for purposes of any enforcement proceeding under this Chapter.
C. This Chapter applies exclusively to gestational carrier arrangements in
which the gestational carrier has no genetic relationship to the child. In a gestational
surrogacy, the embryo is created from the egg of the intended mother or a donor,
fertilized with the sperm of the intended father or a donor, and transferred to the
gestational carrier. The gestational carrier's own egg shall not be used in any
arrangement regulated under this Chapter. Traditional surrogacy arrangements in
which the surrogate's own egg is fertilized are not governed by this Chapter and are
subject to such other law as may be applicable.
PART IV - PARENTAGE
§2720.15. Establishment of parentage
A. Upon the birth of a child pursuant to a compliant gestational carrier
agreement the intended parent or intended parents are the legal parents, the
gestational carrier is not a legal parent, and the gestational carrier's spouse is not a
legal parent. Parentage established pursuant to this Chapter shall be recognized by
all state agencies and courts of this state.
§2720.16. The Louisiana Department of Health Administrative Pre-Parentage
Certification; Vital-Records Authority
A. The legislature finds that the administrative licensing and certification
model established for sensitive reproductive-health facilities under R.S. 40:101 et
seq. provides constitutional authority for the Louisiana Department of Health to issue
regulatory certifications that have operative legal effect without constituting
adjudications of the civil rights of the parties. The Louisiana Department of Health
is authorized to issue an Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification as part of the
compliance certificate process under R.S. 9:2720.12 and R.S. 40:101 et seq. An
Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification is an administrative regulatory
certification and not a judicial parentage order. The Administrative Pre-Parentage
Page 43 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
Certification does not adjudicate the civil right of parentage and does not require or
supplant the district court's original jurisdiction over parentage as a civil matter
pursuant to Article V, Section 16(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
B.(1) An Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification shall be issued by the
Louisiana Department of Health as a component of or simultaneously with the
Louisiana Department of Health compliance certificate pursuant to R.S. 9:2720.12
upon the Louisiana Department of Health's determination that the submission
satisfies all requirements of that Section. The Administrative Pre-Parentage
Certification shall identify all of the following:
(a) The arrangement by its registry number.
(b) The name of the intended parent or intended parents.
(c) The name of the gestational carrier.
(d) The name and license number of the licensed gestational carrier agency,
if any.
(e) The name of the expected birthing facility, if known.
(2) The Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification shall be transmitted
electronically to the parties and their legal counsel, the licensed gestational carrier
agency of record, the expected birthing facility's vital-records registrar.
C. A valid, unrevoked Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification,
transmitted to the Louisiana Vital Records Registry and to the birthing facility's
vital-records registrar pursuant to Subsection B of this Section, constitutes
administrative authority for the vital-records registrar to record the intended parent
or intended parents as the legal parent or parents on the birth certificate of any child
born from the covered arrangement, absent a contrary court order. The
Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification serves the same vital-records function as
an order from the court registry under R.S. 40:34 et seq., without constituting a
judicial determination of parentage. The gestational carrier and, if married, her
spouse shall each execute a relinquishment affidavit in the form prescribed by the
Louisiana Department of Health under R.S. 9:2720.8; the agency shall transmit the
Page 44 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
executed affidavits to the vital-records registrar concurrently with or before birth
notification under R.S. 9:2720.22.
D. An Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification is an administrative
regulatory certification issued by the Louisiana Department of Health in its licensing
and standards-setting capacity. It does not adjudicate legal parentage, does not
constitute a parentage order, and does not divest any party of the right to seek a
judicial parentage determination in a district court of competent jurisdiction. If a
district court subsequently enters a parentage order or an order invalidating or
reforming the agreement, the court order controls and the Louisiana Vital Records
Registry shall amend the birth certificate within fifteen business days of receiving
a certified copy of the order. An Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification may be
revoked or suspended by the Louisiana Department of Health on the grounds and
following the procedures of R.S. 9:2720.12. Revocation does not retroactively
affect a birth certificate already issued under Subsection C of this Section unless a
contrary court order is also obtained.
E. When no licensed gestational carrier agency is involved, the parties may
submit the executed gestational carrier agreement and all required documentation
directly to the Louisiana Department of Health through the portal to obtain an
Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification. The Louisiana Department of Health
shall review the submission on the same timeline and under the same standards as
an agency submission under R.S. 9:2720.12. All provisions of this Section apply
equally to non-agency arrangements.
§2720.17. Best interests of the child
In all proceedings under this Chapter, the best interests of the child shall be
the paramount consideration. A child's status as born through a gestational carrier
arrangement shall not constitute grounds for any adverse determination regarding the
child's welfare, adoption eligibility, or any other matter governed by the laws of this
state.
Page 45 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
PART V - JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS
§2720.18. Jurisdiction; venue; confidentiality
A. The courts have subject matter jurisdiction over all proceedings under this
Chapter. Venue is proper in the parish where an intended parent or intended parents
resides, where the gestational carrier resides, or where the child will be born.
B. All petitions, affidavits, records, and proceedings under this Chapter shall
be sealed by the court and not open to public inspection except upon order of the
court for good cause shown.
§2720.19. Dispute resolution; attorney fees
A. Disputes arising under a gestational carrier agreement may be submitted
to mediation if provided in the agreement, except in cases involving allegations of
fraud, coercion, or duress, or immediate risk to health or safety.
B. In any proceeding under this Chapter in which a court finds that a party
acted in bad faith, the court may award attorney fees, expert witness fees, and court
costs to the prevailing party.
PART VI - CONFLICTS OF LAW
§2720.20. Conflicts
A. All gestational carrier agreements involving a Louisiana-domiciled
gestational carrier, a Louisiana-domiciled intended parent, an embryo transfer
performed in this state, or a child expected to be born in this state are governed
exclusively by state law as set forth in this Chapter, without regard to any
choice-of-law clause in the agreement purporting to apply the law of another state
or country. Any such clause is void as against public policy.
B. No agreement, agency instrument, or party stipulation may waive,
circumvent, or diminish the protections of this Chapter by designating the law of
another jurisdiction. State courts shall apply this Chapter to any covered
arrangement regardless of where the agreement was executed, where the parties are
domiciled, or what law the parties have purported to select.
Page 46 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
C. When a gestational carrier agreement is executed entirely outside of this
state and has no nexus to this state as described in Subsection A of this Section, a
court of competent jurisdiction in this state may, in its discretion, apply this Chapter
or recognize the agreement under principles of comity, provided the agreement does
not violate the mandatory carrier-protection provisions of R.S. 9:2720.8, R.S.
9:2720.9, or R.S. 9:2720.13.
PART VII - PROHIBITED ACTS AND PENALTIES
§2720.21. Prohibited Acts
A. No person shall:
(1) Knowingly induce a woman to enter into a gestational carrier agreement
through fraud, misrepresentation, or undue influence.
(2) Pay or receive compensation conditioned upon relinquishment of
parentage rights or the outcome of the pregnancy in any manner inconsistent with
this Chapter.
(3) Advertise gestational carrier services in a manner that is false or
materially misleading.
B. Any person found in violation of Subsection A of this Section resulting
in harm to a gestational carrier or a child gives rise to a civil cause of action for
compensatory and punitive damages and injunctive relief. Intentional violation of
Paragraphs (A)(1) or (A)(2) of this Section constitutes a misdemeanor punishable by
a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars or imprisonment not exceeding one year,
or both.
PART VIII - ADMINISTRATIVE AND EFFECTIVE DATE PROVISIONS
§2720.22. Vital Records Registry Duties
A. The Louisiana Vital Records Registry shall: (1) establish procedures for
processing parentage orders under this Chapter; (2) issue birth certificates consistent
with parentage orders within fifteen (15) business days of receipt of a certified order;
and (3) maintain records related to parentage orders in a manner that protects the
confidentiality of the parties.
Page 47 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
B. The Louisiana Vital Records Registry and the vital-records registrar at
any birthing facility in this state shall accept a valid Administrative Pre-Parentage
Certification issued in accordance with R.S. 9:2720.16 as administrative authority
to record the intended parent or intended parents as parent or parents on the birth
certificate of any child born from the covered arrangement, subject to the following
conditions:
(1) The Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification identifies the parties to
the arrangement and the licensed gestational carrier agency, if any, by name and the
Louisiana license number.
(2) No contrary court order has been presented to the vital-records registrar.
(3) The gestational carrier and, if married, her spouse, have each executed
a relinquishment affidavit in the form required by R.S. 9:2720.8(B)(4), which the
agency or, in a non-agency arrangement, the parties' counsel shall transmit to the
registrar concurrently with or before birth notification. Recordation of intended
parents on the birth certificate under this Subsection is an administrative
vital-records function; it does not constitute, and shall not be treated as, a judicial
parentage order or adjudication of legal parentage. If a district court subsequently
enters a parentage order or an order invalidating the agreement, the Registry shall
amend the birth certificate within fifteen business days of receiving a certified copy
of the court order.
C. The Louisiana Vital Records Registry shall report to the Louisiana
Department of Health, on a quarterly basis, data on all births registered under this
Section, including the number of birth certificates issued pursuant to a court
parentage order under Subsection A of this Section and the number issued pursuant
to a compliance certificate provided for in Subsection B of this Section, in
furtherance of the data-collection obligations under Title 40.
§2720.23. Construction and severability
This Chapter shall be liberally construed to promote its underlying purposes.
The provisions of this Chapter are severable. If any provision, or its application to
Page 48 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
any person or circumstance, is held unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, such
holding shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions. Nothing in this
Chapter shall be construed to require any individual, religious organization,
healthcare provider, or entity to facilitate or participate in a gestational carrier
arrangement contrary to sincerely held religious beliefs or conscience.
Section 2. R.S. 40:97 and Chapter 2-B of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950, to be comprised of R.S. 40:101 through 127, are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§97. Criminal penalties
A. The following acts and omissions constitute criminal offenses pursuant
to this Chapter, creating a targeted criminal enforcement path distinct from and in
addition to the application of this state's broader felony provisions of R.S. 14:286 to
intermediary conduct:
(1) Unlicensed Operation - Misdemeanor. Any person who operates as a
gestational carrier agency, provides facilitating services, or advertises gestational
carrier matching or coordination services in this state without a valid license,
knowing that a license is required, commits a misdemeanor, punishable by: (a) a fine
of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation; or (b) imprisonment
for not more than six (6) months; or (c) both such fine and imprisonment. Each day
of unlicensed operation constitutes a separate violation.
(2) Unlicensed Operation - Felony. Any person who operates as a
gestational carrier agency without a valid license and, in the course of such
unlicensed operation, knowingly engages in fraud, misrepresentation, or deception
that results in actual economic harm to a gestational carrier or intended parent,
commits a felony, punishable by: (a) a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000); or (b) imprisonment, with or without hard labor, for not more than
five (5) years; or (c) both.
(3) Misappropriation of Escrowed Funds - Felony. Any person who
knowingly misappropriates, converts, diverts, or fails to deposit client funds required
to be held in escrow under this Chapter commits a felony, punishable by: (a) a fine
Page 49 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or three times the amount
misappropriated, whichever is greater; or (b) imprisonment, with or without hard
labor, for not more than ten (10) years; or (c) both. This offense is separate from and
may be charged in addition to theft under R.S. 14:67 or fraud under other applicable
statutes.
B. The criminal penalties in this Section are intended to provide a graduated,
targeted enforcement pathway for gestational carrier agency violations, and shall be
construed as supplementing - not replacing - any other criminal statute applicable to
the described conduct. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent
prosecution under R.S. 14:286 or any other applicable criminal statute where the
elements of that statute are satisfied.
C. Criminal prosecutions pursuant to this Section shall be initiated by the
district attorney of the parish in which the offense occurred, or by the attorney
general exercising concurrent jurisdiction.
* * *
CHAPTER 2-B. LOUISIANA FAMILY BUILDING AND MATERNAL HEALTH
PROTECTION ACT FUNCTIONS
§101. Short Title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as Part B of the "Louisiana
Family Building and Maternal Health Protection Act" (the "FBMHA") and, together
with Chapter 1-C of Code Title IV of Code Book III of Title 9, R.S. 9:2718 through
2720.23, constitutes the complete FBMHA. This Chapter may also be cited
separately as the "Louisiana Gestational Carrier Agency Licensing and Consumer
Protection Act."
§102. Legislative findings and purpose
A. The legislature finds that:
(1) Intermediary entities, agencies, programs, brokers, and facilitators, play
an increasing role in connecting intended parents with gestational carriers and in
Page 50 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
coordinating the medical, legal, and logistical aspects of gestational carrier
arrangements.
(2) Unregulated intermediaries pose substantial risks of financial
exploitation, conflicts of interest, inadequate screening of parties, and coercive
recruitment practices targeting economically vulnerable women.
(3) California and New York have demonstrated that
consumer-protection-style regulation of gestational carrier agencies is feasible,
administrable, and protective of all participants without unduly restricting access to
assisted reproduction services.
(4) A dedicated regulatory framework for gestational carrier agencies shall
operate independently from the contract-eligibility rules of Chapter 1-C of Code
Title IV of Code Book III of Title 9, R.S. 9:2718 through 2720.23, so that agency
oversight remains effective regardless of any future legislative modifications to the
scope of enforceable gestational carrier agreements or compensation rules.
(5) The regulation of gestational carrier agencies under this Chapter is
designed to be consistent with Louisiana's Human Embryo Statutes, R.S. 9:121-133,
which define an in vitro fertilized human ovum as a juridical person with specified
rights and protections. As the Fourth Circuit made clear in Loeb v. Vergara, 313 So.
3d 346 (La. App. 4th Cir. 2021), courts will not rewrite the embryo-protective
scheme; legislative action is the proper mechanism for reform. Agency regulation
under this Chapter is accordingly framed as a consumer-protection and
professional-licensing measure, not as an endorsement of the commodification of
embryos or children. The licensing, escrow, disclosure, and conflict-of-interest
standards of this Chapter serve to ensure transparency and protect participants, in a
manner consistent with the protective purposes of state statutes relative to human
embryos.
(6) This state's existing data-collection infrastructure provided for in R.S.
40:94 which requires the state registrar to collect and report data on gestational
carrier contracts, including carrier and intended-parent characteristics, treating
Page 51 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
physicians, medical procedures, and outcomes provides an established and
operational foundation upon which this Chapter's expanded reporting requirements
are built. The agency-level reporting obligations of this Chapter are designed to
modernize and extend the framework of R.S. 40:94 to cover compensated
arrangements, agency involvement, financial flows, and adverse outcomes, in a
manner that supports legislative oversight and enables evidence-based refinement of
the regulatory scheme over time.
(7) The legislature has broad constitutional authority to assign licensing,
quasi-judicial, and enforcement functions to executive agencies in matters that were
not historically adjudicated by district courts as "civil matters" under Article V,
Section 16(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana. The legislature may delegate
rulemaking authority and procedural detail to agencies so long as regulations remain
within the scope of the statutory authorization. Agency contract-award and
discretionary executive decisions are subject to APA review but courts may not order
the agency to act on particular terms. The legislature finds that gestational carrier
agency licensing, standards-setting, escrow oversight, and enforcement under this
Chapter are regulatory and executive functions, not civil matters historically
adjudicated by district courts, and that the assignment of those functions to the
Louisiana Department of Health is constitutionally permissible. District courts
retain original jurisdiction over parentage determinations, enforcement of gestational
carrier agreements, and all civil disputes between parties, consistent with Article V,
Section 16(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(8) The Louisiana Department of Health already exercises, through its Health
Standards Section, precisely the type of licensing, inspection, standards-setting, and
data-compliance authority contemplated by this Chapter. The creation of a
"gestational carrier agency" licensing category within the Louisiana Department of
Health is therefore an incremental extension of existing institutional authority, not
a novel grant of power.
B. The purpose of this Chapter is to all of the following:
Page 52 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(1) Define and scope "gestational carrier agency" as a covered entity
whenever it recruits, matches, coordinates, markets, or collects fees in connection
with gestational carrier arrangements involving state residents or medical procedures
performed in this state.
(2) Require licensure of gestational carrier agencies and vest the Louisiana
Department of Health with audit, disciplinary, and enforcement authority.
(3) Mandate escrow and financial controls modeled on California and New
York.
(4) Separate agency regulation from Louisiana's eligibility limits for
enforceable contracts to ensure that the Louisiana Family Building and Maternal
Health Protection Act functions even if this state later broadens contract eligibility
or compensation rules.
§103. Definitions
A. As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings ascribed
to them in this Section:
(1) "Agency" means any gestational carrier agency as defined in this Section.
(2) "Advertising" means any written, oral, digital, or broadcast
communication, including websites, social media, print, email, and radio or
television, used to recruit gestational carriers, solicit intended parents, or promote the
facilitating services of a gestational carrier agency, regardless of whether
compensation is sought.
(3) "Applicant" means a person or entity that has applied for a license under
this Chapter but has not yet been issued a license.
(4) "Client funds" means all funds received by a licensee from or on behalf
of any party to a covered arrangement, including gestational carrier compensation,
expense reimbursements, insurance premium reserves, medical expense reserves,
legal fee advances, and any other financial consideration collected, held, or managed
by the licensee in connection with a covered arrangement. Client funds do not
include fees earned and retained by the licensee as compensation for its own
Page 53 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
facilitating services, provided such fees are separately identified and not commingled
with client funds.
(5) "Complaint" means a written statement submitted to the Department by
any person alleging a violation of this Chapter by a licensee, applicant, or unlicensed
entity.
(6) "Covered arrangement" means any gestational carrier arrangement in
which any of the following are true:
(a) The gestational carrier is a state resident.
(b) The intended parent or intended parents are state residents.
(c) The embryo transfer or pregnancy is initiated or carried to term in this
state, regardless of where any agreement was executed or where any party resides.
(7) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(8) "Gestational carrier agency" or "agency" means any partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, nonprofit organization, professional
association, or other legal entity that provides or offers to provide facilitating
services in connection with a covered arrangement for compensation or the
expectation of compensation, whether or not the entity is domiciled in this state. A
natural person acting solely as an individual, and not through or on behalf of a
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity, is not a
gestational carrier agency and is not required to obtain a license pursuant to this
Chapter solely by reason of such individual activity.
(9) "Gestational carrier contract" means a gestational carrier agreement as
defined in R.S. 9:2720, and also includes any agreement between a gestational
carrier and intended parents that does not fully comply with the requirements of R.S.
9:2718 through 2720.23 but that is nonetheless facilitated by a licensee within the
scope of this Chapter.
(10) "Independent escrow agent" means a person or entity that is all of the
following:
Page 54 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(a) Not a party to, or an affiliate, owner, officer, employee, or contractor of,
the agency or any party to the covered arrangement.
(b) Either a Louisiana-licensed attorney maintaining a client trust account
or a licensed escrow company, trust company, or federally insured financial
institution authorized to provide escrow services.
(c) Administers escrow accounts in accordance with the requirements of this
Chapter.
(11) "Intended parent(s)" has the same meaning as in R.S. 9:2720.
(12) "Licensee" means a gestational carrier agency that holds a valid license
in accordance with this Chapter.
(13) "Matching" means the introduction, referral, or connection of a
gestational carrier with one or more intended parents, or vice versa, for the purpose
of entering into a gestational carrier contract.
(14) "Program" means a structured set of facilitating services offered by a
hospital, fertility clinic, university, nonprofit, or other entity that is not primarily
organized as a gestational carrier agency but that regularly performs facilitating
services in connection with covered arrangements. A program is subject to this
Chapter to the same extent as an agency.
(15) "Registry" means the public registry of licensed gestational carrier
agencies maintained by the Louisiana Department of Health in accordance this
Chapter.
(16) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health
or the secretary's designee.
(17) "Surrogacy program" means a program as defined in this Subsection.
B. Terms defined in R.S. 9:2720 and not otherwise defined in this Chapter
shall have the same meaning as in that section when used in this Chapter. In the
event of a conflict between a definition in R.S. 9:2720 and a definition in this
Chapter, the definition in this Chapter shall control for purposes of the Louisiana
Family Building and Maternal Health Protection Act functions.
Page 55 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§104. Gestational carrier matching or coordinating services; licensure
A. No person shall operate, offer, or advertise gestational carrier matching
or coordination services in this state, or to resident clients in this state, without first
obtaining and maintaining a valid license issued by the department in accordance
with this Chapter. This prohibition applies without regard to whether the person is
domiciled, organized, or physically located in this state.
B. Coverage is triggered whenever the person does any of the following:
(1) Solicits or recruits a state resident to serve as a gestational carrier.
(2) Contracts with or provides matching or coordination services to intended
parents domiciled in Louisiana.
(3) Coordinates an embryo transfer performed in this state or coordinates or
facilitates a birth occurring in this state.
(4) Receives fees, deposits, or other consideration from resident clients of
this state in connection with a covered arrangement.
C. Each branch office or separate location from which an agency provides
facilitating services shall be separately licensed, unless the department, by rule,
provides otherwise.
D. A license issued in accordance with this Chapter is non-transferable. A
change of ownership, controlling interest, or legal structure of a licensee constitutes
a change of ownership requiring prior written approval of the department and, at the
department's discretion, submission of a new license application.
E. A person is not required to obtain a license in accordance with this
Chapter if he is any of the following:
(1) A licensed attorney acting solely as legal counsel to a party and not
performing matching, recruitment, or financial management services.
(2) A licensed healthcare provider performing only medical procedures.
(3) A licensed mental health professional performing only psychological
evaluations or counseling.
Page 56 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(4) A donor, gestational carrier, or intended parent acting on their own behalf
without providing facilitating services to others for compensation.
(5) A natural person acting solely as an individual and not through or on
behalf of any partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal
entity, as defined by this Chapter. Nothing in this Subsection limits the application
of R.S. 9:2720.21 or any other provision of law to conduct by a natural person that
constitutes fraud, coercion, or misrepresentation in connection with a covered
arrangement.
F. Operation without a required license is a violation of this Chapter and
subjects the unlicensed person or entity to the penalties set provided for in this
Chapter. The existence of an unlicensed arrangement does not in itself void or
render unenforceable a gestational carrier agreement otherwise compliant with R.S.
9:2718 through 2720.23.
§105. Application for license
A. An application for a license under this Chapter shall be submitted to the
department on a form prescribed by the secretary and shall demonstrate compliance
with the all of the following minimum requirements:
(1) The applicant shall:
(a) Be duly organized and in good standing under the laws of the state of its
organization.
(b) If not organized in accordance with the laws of this state, be registered
to do business in this state as a foreign entity.
(c) Provide a certificate of good standing from the applicable jurisdiction
issued within ninety days of the application date.
(2) Each owner, officer, director, partner, and manager with a controlling
interest of five percent or more shall submit to a criminal background check
conducted through the Louisiana State Police and, where applicable, through a
federal criminal database. A felony conviction within the preceding ten years, a
conviction at any time for a crime involving fraud, misrepresentation, theft, or
Page 57 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
financial dishonesty, a conviction at any time for a sexual offense or crime against
a child, or a prior revocation or surrender of a license to operate a gestational carrier
agency, adoption agency, fertility clinic, or similar entity in this state or any other
jurisdiction shall disqualify a principal from participation as a licensee.
(3) The applicant shall submit written policies and procedures that address,
at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) Screening criteria and protocols for gestational carriers and intended
parents.
(b) Disclosure obligations to all parties.
(c) Complaint handling and internal dispute resolution procedures; (d) record
retention and confidentiality.
(d) Protocols for referral to independent legal counsel and mental health
professionals.
(4) The applicant shall provide written documentation demonstrating that it
has established, or will establish prior to receiving any client funds, an escrow
arrangement complying with the provisions of this Chapter. This shall include
identification of the independent escrow agent and a description of the proposed
escrow account structure.
(5) The applicant shall provide either of the following:
(a) Proof of a surety bond executed by a surety company authorized to do
business in this state, in a principal amount of not less than two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, conditioned on faithful compliance with this Chapter and proper
management of client funds.
(b) In lieu of a bond, a deposit of cash, certificates of deposit, or government
securities in the required amount with the department. In addition, each licensee
shall maintain professional liability insurance covering claims arising from
facilitating services, in a minimum amount established by rule. Cancellation of
required coverage is grounds for immediate license suspension.
Page 58 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(6) The applicant shall designate a qualified person responsible for
day-to-day operations who has completed at least twenty hours of training in
gestational carrier law, reproductive medicine, psychological considerations in
third-party reproduction, and escrow management, as prescribed by rule and has not
been convicted of a disqualifying offense provided for in Subsection A of this
Section.
(7) Payment of an initial license fee established by rule of the department,
not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars.
B. The department shall complete review of a completed application within
ninety days of receipt. Incomplete applications shall be returned with written notice
of deficiencies within thirty days. The department may conduct background checks
of any principal through the Louisiana State Police or equivalent federal agency as
a condition of licensure.
§106. Escrow
A. For each covered arrangement in which a licensee collects, receives, or
manages client funds, the licensee shall cause all client funds to be deposited into an
escrow account administered by an independent escrow agent prior to the
commencement of any medical procedure. The escrow account shall be all of the
following:
(1) Held in the name of the independent escrow agent, or in the name of the
licensee "as escrow agent for" the relevant parties with unique arrangement
identification.
(2) A segregated, interest-bearing account, separate from any operating
account, general account, or other funds of the licensee.
(3) Not subject to any lien, levy, attachment, or encumbrance by any creditor
of the licensee.
(4) Insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or equivalent
federal insurance program up to applicable limits.
Page 59 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
B. A licensee may not serve as its own escrow agent. All client funds shall
be held by an independent escrow agent as defined in this Chapter. The use of an
independent escrow agent does not relieve the licensee of ultimate responsibility for
compliance with this Chapter.
C. A licensee shall direct the intended parent or intended parents to deposit
into the escrow account, prior to commencement of any embryo transfer procedure,
the full estimated amounts for all of the following:
(1) Gestational carrier compensation.
(2) Gestational carrier expense reimbursements
(3) A medical expense reserve in an amount established by rule of the
department, based on anticipated maternity-related costs not covered by insurance.
D. An escrow accounts maintained under this Chapter shall be separate from
any operating accounts of the licensee. Agency fees and operating expenses of the
licensee shall not be disbursed from the client escrow account. Agency fees shall be
held separately and disbursed only in accordance with the parents-agency enrollment
agreement required by R.S. 9:2720.
E. Disbursements from the escrow account shall be made:
(1) In accordance with the disbursement schedule set forth in the gestational
carrier contract and the escrow agreement.
(2) Upon joint written authorization of the parties or upon order of a court
of competent jurisdiction, except for disbursements that are automatic under the
agreed schedule.
(3) To the gestational carrier personally, or to third-party providers for
services rendered directly on her behalf, as specified in the agreement.
F. In the event the covered arrangement is terminated prior to pregnancy, any
unexpended client funds shall be returned within fifteen business days, less only
amounts properly earned and documented. In the event of a disbursement dispute,
the licensee shall interplead the disputed funds with the district court. The licensee
shall not unilaterally disburse disputed funds.
Page 60 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§107. Escrow recordkeeping and reporting
A. A licensee shall maintain complete and accurate records of all client
escrow accounts, including all of the following:
(1) Bank statements for each account for the duration of the arrangement and
for not less than ten years thereafter.
(2) A disbursement ledger identifying the date, amount, recipient, and
purpose of every disbursement.
(3) All escrow agreements and amendments.
(4) All correspondence with the independent escrow agent.
B. Each licensee shall file an annual financial report with the department
within ninety days after the close of the licensee's fiscal year, including all of the
following:
(1) A statement of all escrow accounts with opening balances, total deposits,
disbursements, and closing balances.
(2) A certified audit or review by an independent CPA licensed in this state
if aggregate client funds under management exceeded five hundred thousand dollars
during the reporting year.
(3) A statement of the number of covered arrangements initiated, active,
completed, and terminated during the reporting year.
(4) Disclosure of any civil judgments, regulatory actions, or criminal
proceedings involving the licensee or any principal.
§108. Mandatory disclosure packet
A. Before collecting any fee, deposit, or other consideration from any party
to a covered arrangement, a licensee shall deliver to each party a mandatory written
disclosure packet. The disclosure packet shall be in plain language and shall include
all of the following:
(1)(a) A complete itemized schedule of all fees, charges, and costs to be
assessed by the licensee, separately identifying all of the following:
(i) Agency fees.
Page 61 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(ii) Third-party service fees anticipated to be incurred.
(iii) Estimated gestational carrier compensation and expense
reimbursements.
(iv) Escrow administration fees.
(b) The disclosure shall include the licensee's complete refund policy, stating
the specific circumstances under which any fee will be refunded and within what
timeframe.
(2) A full identification of all of the following:
(a) All entities affiliated with or under common ownership or control with
the licensee.
(b) All attorneys, healthcare providers, mental health professionals,
insurance agents, and other service providers to whom the licensee customarily refers
clients.
(c) The nature and amount of any referral fee, commission, revenue-sharing
arrangement, or other financial relationship between the licensee and any such
referral recipient.
(3) A plain-language summary of all of the following:
(a) Louisiana's contract enforceability constraints and requirements under
R.S. 9:2718 through 2720.23, including the eligibility requirements for an
enforceable gestational carrier agreement.
(b) Criminal prohibitions applicable to gestational carrier arrangements
including R.S. 14:286 and the provisions of this Chapter.
(c) A statement that the licensee's compliance with this Chapter does not
guarantee that a gestational carrier contract will be enforceable in accordance with
Title 9.
(4) A description of all of the following:
(a) The identity, address, and contact information of the independent escrow
agent who will hold client funds.
(b) The disbursement rules and schedule applicable to the arrangement.
Page 62 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(c) The gestational carrier's right to receive monthly escrow accountings.
(d) How to contact the department with concerns about fund handling.
(5) A description of all of the following:
(a) The licensee's internal complaint handling process and the timeframe for
responding to complaints.
(b) The procedure for filing a complaint with the department.
(c) The private right of action available to parties provided for in this
Chapter.
(d) The mediation and arbitration provisions, if any, in the parents-agency
enrollment agreement or the carrier-agency engagement agreement.
B. The disclosure packet shall be provided to each party at least five business
days before the licensee collects any fee or executes any services contract. Each
party shall sign a written acknowledgment of receipt of the disclosure packet, which
acknowledgment the licensee shall retain for not less than ten years.
C. The department shall publish a model disclosure packet form, which a
licensees may use or adapt provided the substance of each required element is
preserved.
§109. Advertising Standards and Prohibited Advertising
A. All advertising by a licensee shall do all of the following:
(1) Accurately identify the legal name of the licensee and its Louisiana
license number.
(2) Not contain materially false or misleading statements regarding the
agency's services, fees, outcomes, success rates, or regulatory status.
(3) Not exploit the economic vulnerability or emotional circumstances of
prospective gestational carriers or intended parents.
(4) Not use testimonials or endorsements without the written consent of the
person whose testimonial or likeness is used.
Page 63 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
B. A licensee shall not advertise that it is licensed, certified, or approved by
the this state in any manner beyond stating its license number, unless the department
has issued a specific designation authorizing such representation.
C. A licensee shall not engage in advertising that is primarily directed at
recruiting gestational carriers from populations receiving means-tested public
assistance, unless the licensee first verifies that each prospective gestational carrier
meets the eligibility requirements of R.S. 9:2720.1 and that appropriate independent
healthcare coverage will be provided.
D. The department may by rule establish additional advertising standards
consistent with the purposes of this Chapter.
§110. Prohibited Practices - General
A. A licensee shall not engage in any of the following acts or omissions in
connection with a covered arrangement:
(1) Including, presenting, negotiating, recommending, or knowingly
facilitating execution of any provision in a gestational carrier contract that requires,
compels, incentivizes, conditions compensation upon, or imposes any penalty on a
gestational carrier for refusing to terminate a pregnancy, for any reason, including
prenatal diagnosis of disability, genetic variation, chromosomal condition, fetal
health condition, sex selection, or fetal reduction in a multiple-gestation pregnancy.
Any such contract provision is absolutely null and unenforceable under R.S.
9:2720.9, and a licensee's presentation or facilitation of such a provision is an
independent ground for license suspension or revocation. This prohibition applies
regardless of whether the intended parent or intended parents request the provision
and regardless of whether the gestational carrier initially assents.
(2) Threatening, penalizing, reducing compensation of, withholding escrow
disbursements from, or taking any other adverse action against a gestational carrier
by reason of her refusal to terminate a pregnancy, whether or not a contractual
provision purporting to authorize such action existed in the gestational carrier
contract.
Page 64 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(3) Recruiting, soliciting, or marketing gestational carrier services using
materially false or misleading statements, or exploiting economic hardship or
vulnerability of prospective gestational carriers or intended parents.
(4) Commingling client funds or escrow funds with the licensee's operating
funds, general accounts, or any other funds.
(5) Charging fees to a gestational carrier as a condition of her enrollment or
participation in a covered arrangement without full written disclosure approved in
advance by the gestational carrier and her independent counsel.
(6) Retaliating against a gestational carrier or intended parent who files a
complaint with the Department or who exercises any right in accordance with this
Chapter or R.S. 9:2718 through 2720.23
(7) Misrepresenting the licensee's qualifications, experience, affiliations,
regulatory status, or success rates.
B. A violation of Paragraph (A)(1) or (A)(2) of this Section is an
independent ground for license revocation without the requirement of a corrective
action plan or prior lesser sanction, and shall be reported by the department to the
attorney general for consideration of criminal referral in accordance with R.S.
40:2199.24 or other applicable law.
§111. Mandatory screening and documentation
A. Prior to completing any matching of a gestational carrier with intended
parents, a licensee shall document all of the following:
(1) The gestational carrier has completed a medical evaluation by a licensed
healthcare provider experienced in reproductive medicine and has received written
clearance to proceed with the arrangement, as required by R.S. 9:2720.1. The
licensee shall obtain and retain a copy of the signed written clearance letter
confirming that the licensed healthcare provider reviewed a complete medical history
in all categories specified in R.S. 9:2720.1 and found the gestational carrier
medically suitable to carry a pregnancy. The licensee shall not retain the gestational
carrier's full medical records; retention of the clearance letter is sufficient to satisfy
Page 65 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
this requirement. The licensee shall further document that the gestational carrier
meets the age requirements of R.S. 9:2720.1, including written confirmation that she
is at least twenty-four and not more than forty years of age at the time of matching,
consistent with the statutory age range and the age range recommended by the
American Society for Reproductive Medicine.
(2) The gestational carrier has executed the agreement and the agreement
includes the mandatory counseling obligation required by R.S. 9:2720.2, et seq.
Prior to authorizing or coordinating any embryo transfer procedure, the licensee shall
confirm and document that the gestational carrier has completed at least two
counseling sessions with a licensed mental health professional as specified in R.S.
9:2720.2, each separated by not less than thirty calendar days. The licensee shall
retain a copy of the written report and the gestational carrier's signed certification
required by R.S. 9:2720.2.
(3) The intended parent or intended parents have executed the agreement and
the agreement includes the mandatory counseling obligation required by R.S.
9:2720.2. Prior to authorizing or coordinating any embryo transfer procedure, the
licensee shall confirm and document that each intended parent has completed at least
two counseling sessions with a licensed mental health professional as specified in
R.S. 9:2720.2, each separated by not less than thirty calendar days. The sessions shall
include informed-consent counseling on the health and psychological risks of
gestational carrier arrangements, the gestational carrier's absolute right to refuse
termination in accordance with R.S. 9:2720.9, and the emotional dimensions of
third-party reproduction. The licensee shall retain a copy of the written report and
each intended parent's signed certification required by R.S. 9:2720.2.
B. A licensee shall not proceed with a match or referral where any medical
or psychological screening has identified a disqualifying condition, unless that
condition is disclosed in writing to all parties and each party provides informed
written consent to proceed.
Page 66 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
C. A licensee shall retain all screening and counseling documentation for not
less than ten years from the date of the last service provided in connection with the
relevant arrangement. Records shall be subject to audit by the department in
accordance with this Chapter.
D.(1) Prior to completing any match, a licensee shall verify and document
compliance with the financial eligibility requirements of R.S. 9:2720.7, as
applicable. The licensee shall do all of the following:
(a) Collect and review the income documentation specified in R.S. 9:2720.7
from each intended parent or, in the case of joint intended parents, from both.
(b) Confirm in a written pre-match checklist that the applicable threshold is
satisfied, or that a waiver has been obtained in accordance with R.S. 9:2720.7).
(c) Retain all income documentation and the pre-match checklist in the
arrangement file for not less than ten years.
(2) A licensee may not proceed to match any intended parent who fails to
satisfy the applicable income threshold and has not obtained a waiver. Failure to
verify income documentation before a match is an independent ground for
administrative sanctions in accordance with this Chapter.
E. If a licensee facilitates a familial carrier arrangement as described in R.S.
9:2720.1, the licensee shall, prior to completing a match and in addition to all other
requirements of this Section, do all of the following:
(1) Confirm in writing that the gestational carrier's licensed mental health
professional has conducted the additional third counseling session required by R.S.
9:2720.1 and that the written coercion-screening finding required by R.S. 9:2720.1
has been completed and contains no unresolved indicators of coercion.
(2) Obtain and retain the carrier's attorney's written familial-arrangement
advice required by R.S. 9:2720.1.
(3) Prepare and have the gestational carrier separately sign the
familial-arrangement disclosure required by R.S. 9:2720.1.
Page 67 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(4) Include a "Familial Carrier" designation flag in the arrangement's file in
the Louisiana Department of Health Gestational Carrier Registry, so that the
arrangement is included in departments annual data reporting on familial
arrangements. A licensee that proceeds to match in a familial arrangement without
satisfying all requirements of this Subsection shall be subject to mandatory
disciplinary action in the form of a corrective action plan and civil liability as
provided for in this Chapter.
§112. Independent Counsel Requirement
A. Before any gestational carrier contract is executed, the licensee shall
ensure that all of the following has occurred:
(1) The gestational carrier has retained independent legal counsel of her own
choosing to advise her regarding the terms and legal consequences of the gestational
carrier contract.
(2) The intended parent or intended parents have retained separate
independent legal counsel to advise them regarding the terms and legal consequences
of the gestational carrier contract.
B. "Independent" counsel for each party means an attorney who meets all of
the following qualifications:
(1) Retained by and owes a duty of loyalty exclusively to that party.
(2) Selected by, is not compensated by, and has no financial relationship
with the opposing party or the licensee.
(3) Not represented, and does not currently represent, any other party to the
arrangement in a conflicted capacity.
C. The legal fees of the gestational carrier's independent counsel shall be
paid by the intended parent or intended parents as a direct payment or from escrow,
and not conditioned upon the carrier's choice of attorney. A licensee shall not
require or recommend a specific attorney to a gestational carrier unless the licensee
discloses in writing any financial relationship between the licensee and the
recommended attorney.
Page 68 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§113. Conflict-of-interest safeguards
A. A licensee shall not be owned, controlled, or managed, in whole or in
material part, by an attorney who represents any party to a covered arrangement
facilitated by the licensee, whether as an owner, officer, director, partner, manager,
or employee.
B. A licensee shall not pay, offer to pay, or receive referral fees,
commissions, revenue-sharing payments, or any other thing of value to or from any
attorney who represents a party to a covered arrangement facilitated by the licensee
or any licensed healthcare provider or mental health professional to whom the
licensee refers clients in connection with a covered arrangement.
C. A licensee shall not simultaneously represent the interests of both the
gestational carrier and the intended parents in the negotiation of any gestational
carrier contract, whether directly or through affiliated entities or persons.
D. Any financial relationship between the licensee and any attorney,
healthcare provider, or mental health professional involved in a covered arrangement
shall be fully disclosed in the mandatory disclosure packet provided for in this
Chapter. Failure to disclose such a relationship is an independent ground for
disciplinary action.
§114. Insurance Verification Requirements
A. Before a gestational carrier contract is executed, a licensee shall verify
and document, in writing and in a form retained for not less than ten years, that the
gestational carrier will have health insurance coverage for the pregnancy, delivery,
and postpartum period, obtained through one or more of the following means:
(1) The gestational carrier's existing health insurance policy, verified by a
review of the policy or a written confirmation from the insurer that the policy covers
gestational carrier pregnancies and that no exclusion, limitation, or surcharge applies.
(2) A new or supplemental health insurance policy obtained by the intended
parent or intended parents specifically for the gestational carrier's pregnancy and
delivery and for a period of not less than twelve months postpartum.
Page 69 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
B. The verification documentation shall include all of the following:
(1) The name of the insurer, the policy number, and the identity of the
policyholder.
(2) Written confirmation from the insurer, or a legal opinion from
independent counsel, confirming all of the following:
(a) Gestational carrier pregnancies are covered under the policy.
(b) The insurer has been informed of the gestational carrier arrangement or,
if the policy does not require such disclosure, that non-disclosure does not constitute
a basis for denial of coverage.
(c) The policy does not contain an exclusion, limitation, or
coordination-of-benefits clause that would result in denial of coverage for maternity
care arising from a gestational carrier arrangement.
(3) A description of any coverage limitations, including annual or lifetime
benefit limits, copayment or deductible obligations, and any notice requirements
under the policy.
C. The gestational carrier contract shall expressly disclose to the gestational
carrier all of the following:
(1) The name, policy number, and insurer for each applicable health
insurance policy.
(2) Any coverage limitations identified in Paragraph (A)(3) of this Section.
(3) Any notice requirements that must be satisfied to trigger coverage.
(4) The allocation of financial responsibility between the parties for any
medical costs not covered by insurance.
D. If, at any time during the gestational carrier arrangement, health insurance
coverage lapses, is cancelled, or is determined to be inadequate, the licensee shall
promptly notify all parties in writing and shall ensure that replacement coverage is
obtained before any further medical procedure is performed. Failure to maintain
adequate coverage is grounds for disciplinary action against the licensee.
Page 70 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§115. Recordkeeping requirements
A. A licensee shall maintain records for each covered arrangement for a
minimum of ten years from the date of the last service provided in connection with
that arrangement. The records shall include all of the following:
(1) All executed client services contracts and gestational carrier contracts.
(2) The mandatory disclosure packet and each party's signed
acknowledgment of receipt.
(3) All screening and counseling documentation required by this Chapter.
(4) All documentation of independent legal counsel compliance required by
this Chapter.
(5) All insurance verification documentation required by this Chapter.
(6) All escrow account records required by this Chapter.
(7) All advertising materials used or disseminated by the licensee during the
license term.
(8) All complaints received and the licensee's written response and
resolution.
(9) All correspondence with the department.
B. Records shall be maintained in a format that is organized, legible, and
reproducible, and shall be made available to the department for inspection or audit
within ten business days of a written request, or such shorter period as the
department may specify in an emergency.
§116. Confidentiality protections
A. All records maintained by a licensee in connection with a covered
arrangement shall be treated as confidential. A licensee shall not disclose the
identity, personal information, medical information, or financial information of any
gestational carrier, intended parent, or child to any person not a party to the
arrangement or their legal representatives, except in any of the following:
(1) Disclosure is required by applicable law.
Page 71 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(2) Disclosure is necessary for the performance of the facilitating services
with the written consent of the relevant party.
(3) Disclosure is required due to a court order.
(4) Disclosure to the department in connection with an audit, inspection, or
investigation.
B. A licensee shall implement reasonable administrative, physical, and
technical safeguards to protect the confidentiality and security of all records
maintained under this Chapter, consistent with applicable state and federal law
including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) where
applicable.
§117. Audit authority
A. The department shall have authority to do all of the following:
(1) Conduct routine announced audits and inspections of each licensee at
least once every two years.
(2) Conduct unannounced for-cause audits and inspections upon receipt of
a complaint or upon reasonable suspicion of a violation.
(3) Require a licensee to produce, within ten business days of a written
request, any records required by this Chapter.
(4) Interview employees, contractors, gestational carriers, and intended
parents in connection with an investigation.
(5) Retain independent certified public accountants or other experts to assist
in financial audits, at the cost of the licensee if a material violation is found.
B. Licensees shall cooperate fully with audits and inspections. Interference
with, obstruction of, or failure to cooperate with an audit or inspection is an
independent ground for disciplinary action.
C. The department may share audit findings and investigation records with
law enforcement agencies, other state licensing boards, and regulatory authorities of
other states pursuant to information-sharing agreements, subject to applicable
confidentiality protections.
Page 72 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§118. Complaint procedure
A. Any person may file a written complaint with the department alleging a
violation of this Chapter. Complaints shall be filed on a form prescribed by the
department. The department shall complete all of the following:
(1) Acknowledge receipt within ten business days.
(2) Conduct a preliminary review within forty-five days to determine
whether further investigation is warranted.
(3) Notify the complainant of the outcome of the preliminary review.
B. Complaints filed in good faith shall be confidential until the department
takes final disciplinary action, at which point the department's final order shall be a
public record. The identity of a complainant who is a gestational carrier shall be
protected from public disclosure to the maximum extent permitted by law.
§119. Public registry
A. The department shall maintain a publicly accessible registry of all
licensed gestational carrier agencies, available on the department's website and
updated not less than monthly. The registry shall include all of the following:
(1) Legal name and trade names.
(2) Principal office address and all licensed locations.
(3) License number and license status.
(4) Date of initial licensure and most recent renewal.
(5) Summary of any final disciplinary actions taken within the preceding five
years.
B. The registry shall also include a searchable list of entities or persons
against whom the department has issued a cease-and-desist order or final finding of
unlicensed operation under this Chapter within the preceding five years.
§120. Administrative sanctions
A. After notice and opportunity to be heard in accordance with the Louisiana
Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq., the department may take any one
or more of the administrative sanctions against a licensee or applicant, in a graduated
Page 73 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
manner proportionate to the severity and frequency of the violation. The department
may take any of the following actions:
(1) Denial of an initial or renewal license application.
(2) Issuance of a written reprimand or letter of concern, which shall be a
public record.
(3) Issuance of a corrective action plan requiring specific remediation within
a defined timeframe.
(4) Imposition of conditions, restrictions, or probationary requirements on
a license.
(5) Suspension of a license for a definite period not to exceed two (2) years.
(6) Revocation of a license.
B. Grounds for administrative sanction include, but are not limited to, any
of the following:
(1) Violation of any provision of this Chapter or any rule adopted thereunder.
(2) Fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in obtaining a license or in the
provision of facilitating services.
(3) Misappropriation or commingling of client funds or escrow funds.
(4) Conviction of a disqualifying offense by the licensee or any principal.
(5) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person or entity in the provision of
facilitating services.
(6) Failure to maintain required insurance, fidelity coverage, or surety bond.
(7) Making a materially false or misleading statement to the department.
(8) Repeated or willful violation of any prohibited practice.
C. The department may seek emergency suspension of a license without
prior notice and hearing where it finds that continued operation poses an imminent
risk of harm to a gestational carrier, intended parent, child, or the public, subject to
a post-suspension hearing within fifteen days.
Page 74 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§121. Civil administrative penalties
A. In addition to or in lieu of other administrative sanctions, the department
may assess civil administrative penalties as follows:
(1) Not more than two thousand five hundred dollars per violation per day
for a first violation.
(2) Not more than ten thousand dollars per violation per day for a second
violation of the same provision within five years.
(3) Not more than twenty-five thousand dollars per violation per day for a
third or subsequent violation of the same provision within five years.
(4) For misappropriation of client funds or escrow funds not more than three
times the amount misappropriated, or one hundred thousand dollars, whichever is
greater, per occurrence.
(5) Not more than five thousand dollars per day for each day of unlicensed
operation for operation without a required license.
B. In determining the amount of any penalty, the department shall consider
all of the following:
(1) The gravity of the violation and the harm caused.
(2) The number of persons affected.
(3) The good faith of the violator.
(4) The history of prior violations.
(5) The ability of the violator to pay.
C. Civil penalties assessed under this Section shall be deposited into the
Gestational Carrier Consumer Protection Fund.
§122. Restitution
A. In any disciplinary proceeding or civil action under this Chapter in which
a violation is established, the department or a court of competent jurisdiction may
order the violating party to pay restitution to any gestational carrier, intended parent,
or other person who suffered actual economic harm as a result of the violation.
B. Restitution may include all of the following:
Page 75 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(1) Return of all client funds misappropriated or improperly disbursed.
(2) Reimbursement of fees paid to the licensee for services not rendered.
(3) Reimbursement of costs incurred by the aggrieved party to mitigate the
effects of the violation.
(4) Any other actual economic loss directly caused by the violation.
C. An order of restitution is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil
penalty, administrative sanction, or private right of action available under this
Chapter.
§123. Gestational Carrier Consumer Protection Fund
A. There is hereby created in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Gestational Carrier Consumer Protection Fund, hereinafter referred to in this Section
as the "fund". The fund shall consist of any monies appropriated by the legislature
and any civil penalties, or license fees collected in accordance with this Chapter.
Monies appropriated or transferred to the fund shall be deposited by the state
treasurer after compliance with the provisions of Article VII, Section 9(B) of the
Constitution of Louisiana. Monies in the fund shall be invested by the treasurer in
the same manner as the state general fund monies. Interest earned on monies in the
fund shall be credited to the fund. All unexpended and unencumbered monies and
earnings remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
B. The monies in the fund shall be administered by the Louisiana
Department of Health and shall be used exclusively to fund all of the following:
(1) Administration and enforcement of this Chapter.
(2) Consumer education and outreach related to the services provided for
by this Chapter.
(3) Restitution to gestational carriers or intended parents harmed by
violations of this Chapter.
(4) Development and maintenance of the public registry.
Page 76 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
C. The Department of Transportation and Development shall develop
regulations and guidelines for the distribution and allocation of any monies
appropriated to the department pursuant to this Section.
§124. Private right of action
A. Any gestational carrier or intended parent who suffers actual harm as a
result of one or more of the following violations has a private right of action against
the violating party in any court of competent jurisdiction:
(1) Misrepresentation - any material false statement, concealment, or
omission of fact by a licensee or unlicensed entity in connection with the solicitation,
advertisement, or provision of facilitating services, including misrepresentation in
the mandatory disclosure packet required by this Chapter.
(2) Escrow Violations - any failure to establish, fund, maintain, or properly
disburse an escrow account in compliance with the provisions of this Chapter,
including misappropriation, commingling, or unauthorized disbursement of client
funds.
(3) Unlicensed Operation - the provision of facilitating services without a
valid license required by this Chapter, where the plaintiff engaged the unlicensed
entity in reliance on a representation, express or implied , that the entity was licensed
or qualified to provide such services.
B. Standing to bring a private action under this Section is limited to a
gestational carrier who is or was a party to a covered arrangement facilitated by the
defendant and intended parent or parents who are or were parties to a covered
arrangement facilitated by the defendant.
C. A licensee's compliance with a corrective action plan or payment of a
civil penalty in a department disciplinary proceeding shall not bar a private action
in accordance with this Section based on the same conduct and shall not constitute
an admission of liability for purposes of the private action.
Page 77 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§125. Damages, attorney's fees, and remedies
A. In a private action under this Chapter, the prevailing plaintiff may recover
all of the following:
(1) Actual damages, including all client funds misappropriated or improperly
withheld.
(2) Consequential damages proximately caused by the violation.
(3) Reasonable attorney's fees and litigation costs, consistent with
consumer-protection policy and the remedial purpose of this Chapter.
(4) Punitive damages in an amount not to exceed three times the actual
damages awarded, where the trier of fact finds that the violation was willful, wanton,
knowing, or fraudulent.
B. The court may also award injunctive or declaratory relief, including an
order requiring the defendant to do all of the following:
(1) Return all improperly held client funds.
(2) Cease providing facilitating services without a license.
(3) Comply with the escrow and disclosure requirements of this Chapter.
C. A prevailing defendant may recover reasonable attorney's fees and costs
upon a specific finding by the court that the plaintiff's action was frivolous, without
merit, or brought in bad faith.
D. The private right of action under this Chapter is cumulative of, and not
in lieu of, any other remedy available at law or in equity, including remedies under
the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq.
Filing a complaint with the department is not a prerequisite to bringing a private
action in accordance with this Section.
E. An action brought in accordance with this Section shall be filed within
three years from the date the plaintiff knew or reasonably should have known of the
violation giving rise to the claim.
Page 78 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
§126. Louisiana Department of Health Compliance Certification; Louisiana
Department Health Gestational Carrier Registry; data reporting
A. Purpose. This Section establishes the Title 40 procedural framework for
the Louisiana Department of Health Administrative compliance certificate also
known as the "compliance certificate" authorized under R.S. 9:2725.1 and the
Louisiana Department of Health Gestational Carrier Registry.
B.(1) As a condition of licensure and renewal under this Chapter, every
licensee shall do all of the following:
(a) Register with the Louisiana Department of Health compliance submission
portal.
(b) Submit all agreements for which the licensee seeks a compliance
certificate through the portal in the manner and format prescribed by the department.
(c) Maintain portal access and ensure the accuracy of the licensee's
registration information at all times during the license period.
(d) Notify the department within five business days of any material change
in the licensee's designated qualified person, surety bond, escrow arrangement, or
insurance coverage.
(2) The portal shall be accessible by secure login and shall generate a unique
arrangement identification number for each submission. The department shall
maintain the portal so as to ensure availability during normal business hours and
shall provide written notice to all licensees of any planned maintenance downtime
exceeding twenty-four hours.
C.(1) A submission for a compliance certificate shall include all of the
following:
(a) A copy of the fully executed agency-coordinated gestational carrier
agreement with all exhibits, including the two counseling certifications for the
gestational carrier required by R.S. 9:2720.2, and the counseling certifications for the
intended parents required by R.S. 9:2720.2.
Page 79 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(b) The licensee's signed written compliance verification and the affirmative
background-check findings required by R.S. 9:2720.5, including the findings of the
four required checks for all parties.
(c) Documentation of independent legal representation for the gestational
carrier and for the intended parents, including the name and bar number of each
attorney and a certification that no attorney conflict exists.
(d) If applicable, the two signed physician opinions establishing medical
necessity under R.S. 9:2720.3.
(e) evidence of current life and complications insurance coverage for the
gestational carrier satisfying the requirements of this Chapter, and evidence of
current medical insurance coverage for the gestational carrier as required by the
agreement.
(f) Escrow account documentation demonstrating that all compensation and
expense amounts determinable in advance of the embryo transfer have been
pre-funded in accordance with this Section.
(g) Confirmation that the parents-agency enrollment agreement required by
R.S. 9:2720 and the carrier-agency engagement agreement required by R.S. 9:2720
have been executed and are retained in the arrangement file.
(h) Any additional documents required by rule.
(2) All documents shall be submitted as machine-readable PDF attachments.
The department shall acknowledge receipt electronically within one business day and
shall notify the licensee of any missing items within five business days of receipt.
D.(1) The department review required by this Section is limited to all of
following:
(a) Verifying that all required documents are present and facially complete.
(b) Confirming that the agreement is in the statutory form prescribed by R.S.
9:2720.8 and contains no provision that is absolutely null in accordance with R.S.
9:2720.9.
(c) Confirming that the background-check findings satisfy R.S. 9:2720.5.
Page 80 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(d) Confirming that counseling certifications satisfy R.S. 9:2720.2.
(e) Confirming that escrow pre-funding and insurance documentation satisfy
the requirements of this Chapter.
(2) The department's review does not extend to the merits of any medical
judgment, the adequacy of any compensation term, or any factual dispute between
the parties. Within thirty calendar days of a complete submission if the submission
demonstrates compliance, the department shall issue the compliance certificate,
signed by the secretary or designee, and register it in the Gestational Carrier
Registry. If the submission is deficient, the department shall issue a written
deficiency notice identifying each deficiency with specificity and providing fifteen
days to cure, after which the thirty-day clock resets upon receipt of a cured
submission. If compliance cannot be confirmed after cure, the department shall deny
the compliance certificate with a written statement of reasons. The department's
failure to act within thirty days of a complete submission or a cured submission shall
be deemed a denial reviewable in accordance with R.S. 49:964.
E. Effect and Accessibility of Compliance Certificate. A compliance
certificate issued in accordance with this Section:
(1) Constitutes the administrative determination that the submitted
agreement satisfies the statutory form and documentation requirements of R.S.
9:2718 through 9:2723 for purposes of the presumption of validity under R.S.
9:2720.11.
(2) Constitutes, together with the Administrative Pre-Parentage Certification
issued simultaneously under R.S. 9:2720.16, administrative authority for
vital-records staff at any birthing facility in this state and for the Louisiana Vital
Records Registry to list the intended parent or intended parents as parent or parents
on the birth certificate under R.S. 9:2720.22, absent a contrary court order.
(3) Is registered in the Gestational Carrier Registry and is electronically
accessible to the licensee, the parties and their legal counsel, treating healthcare
Page 81 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
providers, and the vital-records registrar at the named birthing facility, through the
portal.
(4) Does not constitute a parentage order, does not adjudicate legal
parentage, and does not preclude any party from seeking a judicial parentage
determination or any other judicial relief under R.S. 9:2720.11 and R.S. 9:2720.15.
(5) Is subject to revocation or suspension by the department on the grounds
and following the procedures set forth in R.S. 9:2720.12.
F.(1) The department shall establish and maintain the Louisiana Gestational
Carrier Registry as a secure electronic database within existing health standards
section infrastructure. The registry shall do all of the following:
(a) Assign a unique arrangement identification number to each submitted
arrangement.
(b) Record the date, status, and unique number of each compliance certificate
issued, denied, suspended, or revoked, and each deficiency notice issued.
(c) Record the name and license number of the submitting agency and the
names of the parties in a restricted-access, HIPAA-compliant field.
(d) Permit the vital-records registrar at any birthing facility in this state to
electronically verify the current status of a compliance certificate in real time.
(e) Be updated within one business day of any change in a certificate's status.
(f) Generate the standardized data reports required by this Section.
(2) Registry records shall be maintained for the period specified in R.S.
40:116 and shall be subject to the confidentiality protections of R.S. 40:217. The
department shall coordinate with the Louisiana Vital Records Registry to ensure that
the two systems can communicate electronically and that vital-records staff have
access to the Registry's certificate-verification function.
G.(1) The department shall collect and compile standardized data from all
submitted arrangements and from the vital records registry in accordance with R.S.
9:2730.22 and shall publish an annual public report that includes, at minimum, all
of the following:
Page 82 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
(a) The total number of compliance certificate submissions, issuances,
deficiency notices, denials, revocations, and suspensions in the reporting year.
(b) The number of arrangements involving first-time and experienced
gestational carriers.
(c) The number of arrangements in which a court parentage order was
subsequently obtained.
(d) Aggregate compensation data, including ranges of base compensation
and total compensation packages.
(e) Adverse outcomes data, including pregnancy complications, maternal
hospitalizations, and neonatal outcomes.
(f) Agency-level compliance metrics, including the rate of deficiency notices
and the average time from complete submission to issuance.
(g) Such additional data fields as the department prescribes by rule to satisfy
the data-collection requirements of R.S. 40:94 as those requirements apply to
compensated and agency-facilitated arrangements.
(2) The department's annual report provided for in this Subsection shall be
published on the department's website. Non-compliance by a licensee with any
data-reporting or registry submission obligation under this Section is an independent
ground for suspension of the licensee's license in accordance with this Chapter.
§127. Rulemaking
The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules necessary to implement this
Chapter.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(27) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
Page 83 of 89
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2306 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1141
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(27) R.S. 40:3.1, 31.14, 31.27, 39.1, 41, 73, 95, 96, 117, 118, 526, 528,
973.1, 978.2.1, 1007, 1061.21, 1079.18, 1081.10, 1105.6, 1105.8, 1125.14, 1133.8,
1168.3, 1171.4, 1203.4, 1231.4, 1379.1.1(D), 1379.3, 2009.8, 2009.14, 2010.5,
2017.9, 2018, 2018.5, 2019, 2020, 2106, 2109.1, 2138, 2175.7(B)(1), 2193.6, 2532,
2845.1
* * *
Section 4. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to redesignate the
provisions of R.S. 40:101, as contained in Part VIII of Chapter 2 of Title 40 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, as R.S. 92.1.
Section 5. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to redesignate
Chapter 2 of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 as Chapter 2-A of Title 40
of the Louisiana Revised Statues of 1950.
Section 6. This Act shall take effect on August 1, 2026. Gestational carrier
agreements executed prior to the effective date shall be governed by the law in effect at the
time of their execution, provided that any party may elect in writing to have the agreement
governed by this Act before entry of a parentage order.